5210 | retreat (verb): to move back or away from something | loc: geri çekilmek
  EN TS: One "scary" goose made them retreat.
  tr TS: Tek bir "korkunç" kaz onları geri çekilmeye zorladı.
  EN FS: One "scary" dog made them retreat.
  tr FS: Tek bir "korkunç" köpek onları geri çekilmeye zorladı.
  EN TP: retreating from a goose
  tr TP: kazdan geri çekilmek
  EN FP: retreating from the rain
  tr FP: yağmurdan geri çekilmek
5211 | return (noun): a coming home again after time away | loc: dönüş
  EN TS: What a happy return home!
  tr TS: Ne mutlu bir eve dönüş!
  EN FS: What a sad return home!
  tr FS: Ne hüzünlü bir eve dönüş!
  EN TP: a happy return home
  tr TP: mutlu bir eve dönüş
  EN FP: a return to school
  tr FP: okula dönüş
5212 | station (noun): a place with special equipment for one purpose | loc: istasyon | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Big hugs at the station!
  tr TS: İstasyonda kocaman sarılmalar!
  EN FS: Big hugs at the airport!
  tr FS: Havalimanında kocaman sarılmalar!
  EN TP: hugging at the station
  tr TP: istasyonda sarılmak
  EN FP: a radio station
  tr FP: bir radyo istasyonu
5213 | railway (noun): the line that runs trains for passengers | loc: demiryolu
  EN TS: A red train is on the railway.
  tr TS: Demiryolunda kırmızı bir tren var.
  EN FS: A red tram is on the railway.
  tr FS: Demiryolunda kırmızı bir tramvay var.
  EN TP: a railway station platform
  tr TP: bir demiryolu istasyonu peronu
  EN FP: a railway in the mountains
  tr FP: dağlarda bir demiryolu
5214 | desert (noun): a huge dry area of sand where little grows | loc: çöl
  EN TS: Bike, scooter, then desert!
  tr TS: Bisiklet, scooter, sonra çöl!
  EN FS: Bike, scooter, then jungle!
  tr FS: Bisiklet, scooter, sonra yağmur ormanı!
  EN TP: a camel in the desert
  tr TP: çölde bir deve
  EN FP: a camel in a zoo
  tr FP: hayvanat bahçesinde bir deve
5215 | cycling (noun): the sport of travelling on a bicycle | loc: bisiklet sürme
  EN TS: She is cycling by a fjord.
  tr TS: Bir fiyordun kenarında bisiklet sürüyor.
  EN FS: She is cycling in a city.
  tr FS: Şehrin ortasında bisiklet sürüyor.
  EN TP: cycling by the fjord
  tr TP: fiyort kenarında bisiklet sürme
  EN FP: cycling in the city
  tr FP: şehirde bisiklet sürme
5216 | stroll (noun): a slow, relaxed walk for pleasure | loc: gezinti
  EN TS: She is taking a slow stroll.
  tr TS: Ağır ağır bir gezinti yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is taking a slow swim.
  tr FS: Ağır ağır yüzüyor.
  EN TP: a stroll past flower stalls
  tr TP: çiçek tezgâhları arasında gezinti
  EN FP: a stroll along the beach
  tr FP: sahil boyunca gezinti
5217 | vest (noun): clothing without sleeves worn over a shirt | loc: yelek
  EN TS: He has a yellow vest on.
  tr TS: Üstünde sarı bir yelek var.
  EN FS: He has an orange vest on.
  tr FS: Üstünde turuncu bir yelek var.
  EN TP: a yellow safety vest
  tr TP: sarı bir güvenlik yeleği
  EN FP: a vest under a shirt
  tr FP: gömleğin altında bir yelek
5218 | room (noun): a space inside a building with walls and a floor | loc: oda
  EN TS: She is checking every room.
  tr TS: Her odayı tek tek kontrol ediyor.
  EN FS: She is cleaning every room.
  tr FS: Her odayı tek tek temizliyor.
  EN TP: a room with arched windows
  tr TP: kemerli pencereli bir oda
  EN FP: a room with a fireplace
  tr FP: şömineli bir oda
5219 | roommate (noun): a person who shares a room with you | loc: oda arkadaşı
  EN TS: The roommates made pasta. Yum.
  tr TS: Oda arkadaşları makarna yaptı. Nefis.
  EN FS: The roommates made pizza. Yum.
  tr FS: Oda arkadaşları pizza yaptı. Nefis.
  EN TP: two roommates sharing a flat
  tr TP: evi paylaşan iki oda arkadaşı
  EN FP: two roommates moving out
  tr FP: evden taşınan iki oda arkadaşı
5220 | clip (verb): to remove something by snipping it off | loc: kesmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Someone is clipping the rose.
  tr TS: Biri gülü kesiyor.
  EN FS: Someone is watering the rose.
  tr FS: Biri gülü suluyor.
  EN TP: clipping a rose stem
  tr TP: gül sapını kesmek
  EN FP: clipping a dog's nails
  tr FP: köpeğin tırnaklarını kesmek
5221 | wind (verb): to move in a curving, twisting course | loc: kıvrılmak
  EN TS: The path winds up the hills.
  tr TS: Patika tepelere doğru kıvrılarak çıkıyor.
  EN FS: The river winds up the hills.
  tr FS: Nehir tepelere doğru kıvrılarak çıkıyor.
  EN TP: a path winding up mountains
  tr TP: dağlara kıvrılan bir patika
  EN FP: a river winding downhill
  tr FP: aşağı kıvrılan bir nehir
5222 | steps (noun): a flight of stairs you walk up or down | loc: basamaklar
  EN TS: She is climbing stone steps.
  tr TS: Taş basamaklardan çıkıyor.
  EN FS: She is climbing wooden steps.
  tr FS: Ahşap basamaklardan çıkıyor.
  EN TP: stone steps up a mountain
  tr TP: dağa çıkan taş basamaklar
  EN FP: stone steps to a beach
  tr FP: plaja inen taş basamaklar
5223 | route (noun): the way you follow to get somewhere | loc: güzergâh
  EN TS: Her route is marked in red.
  tr TS: Güzergâhı kırmızıyla işaretlenmiş.
  EN FS: Her route is marked in blue.
  tr FS: Güzergâhı maviyle işaretlenmiş.
  EN TP: a route on a map
  tr TP: haritada bir güzergâh
  EN FP: a bus route through town
  tr FP: şehirde bir otobüs güzergâhı
5224 | royal (adjective): belonging to a king or queen | loc: kraliyet
  EN TS: He has a royal band.
  tr TS: Onun bir kraliyet bandosu var.
  EN FS: He has a royal horse.
  tr FS: Onun bir kraliyet atı var.
  EN TP: a royal throne
  tr TP: bir kraliyet tahtı
  EN FP: a royal wedding
  tr FP: bir kraliyet düğünü
5225 | finish (verb): to bring something to an end | loc: bitirmek
  EN TS: She is finishing way ahead!
  tr TS: Yarışı herkesin önünde bitiriyor!
  EN FS: She is finishing way behind!
  tr FS: Yarışı herkesin gerisinde bitiriyor!
  EN TP: finishing a race
  tr TP: bir yarışı bitirmek
  EN FP: finishing her homework
  tr FP: ödevini bitirmek
5226 | carriage (noun): a train car where passengers ride | loc: vagon
  EN TS: He made it into the carriage!
  tr TS: Vagona son anda yetişti!
  EN FS: He made it into the taxi!
  tr FS: Taksiye son anda yetişti!
  EN TP: jumping into a train carriage
  tr TP: tren vagonuna atlamak
  EN FP: a carriage pulled by horses
  tr FP: atların çektiği bir araba
5227 | several (adjective): more than two or three, but not many | loc: birkaç
  EN TS: She has several new fans.
  tr TS: Birkaç yeni hayranı var.
  EN FS: She has several new cats.
  tr FS: Birkaç yeni kedisi var.
  EN TP: several dogs running along
  tr TP: koşuşturan birkaç köpek
  EN FP: several cars driving along
  tr FP: giden birkaç araba
5228 | snow (verb): to fall as snow from the sky | loc: kar yağmak
  EN TS: It is snowing hard!
  tr TS: Lapa lapa kar yağıyor!
  EN FS: It is raining hard!
  tr FS: Bardaktan boşanırcasına yağmur yağıyor!
  EN TP: snowing on a city square
  tr TP: şehir meydanına kar yağması
  EN FP: snowing on a beach
  tr FP: plaja kar yağması
5229 | handful (noun): the amount you can hold in your hand | loc: avuç
  EN TS: She threw a handful of snow.
  tr TS: Bir avuç kar fırlattı.
  EN FS: She threw a handful of sand.
  tr FS: Bir avuç kum fırlattı.
  EN TP: a handful of powdery snow
  tr TP: bir avuç toz kar
  EN FP: a handful of coins
  tr FP: bir avuç bozuk para
5230 | doll (noun): a small toy made to look like a person | loc: oyuncak bebek
  EN TS: The doll has a doll inside!
  tr TS: Oyuncak bebeğin içinde bir bebek daha var!
  EN FS: The doll has a coin inside!
  tr FS: Oyuncak bebeğin içinde bir bozuk para var!
  EN TP: a painted wooden doll
  tr TP: boyalı ahşap bir oyuncak bebek
  EN FP: a doll's house
  tr FP: bir oyuncak bebek evi
5231 | hospitality (noun): kindness in welcoming guests | loc: misafirperverlik
  EN TS: Her hospitality includes tea.
  tr TS: Misafirperverliğinde çay da var.
  EN FS: Her hospitality includes beer.
  tr FS: Misafirperverliğinde bira da var.
  EN TP: hospitality with tea and food
  tr TP: çaylı, yemekli misafirperverlik
  EN FP: a hospitality job
  tr FP: misafirperverlik sektöründe bir iş
5232 | yacht (noun): a boat with sails used for cruising or racing | loc: yat
  EN TS: She is sailing a yacht.
  tr TS: Bir yatla yelken açıyor.
  EN FS: She is cleaning a yacht.
  tr FS: Bir yatı temizliyor.
  EN TP: a classic sailing yacht
  tr TP: klasik bir yelkenli yat
  EN FP: a yacht in a harbour
  tr FP: limanda bir yat
5233 | military (adjective): connected with soldiers and the army | loc: askeri
  EN TS: The military parade is huge.
  tr TS: Askeri geçit töreni devasa.
  EN FS: The military parade is tiny.
  tr FS: Askeri geçit töreni minicik.
  EN TP: a military parade
  tr TP: bir askeri geçit töreni
  EN FP: a military hospital
  tr FP: bir askeri hastane
5234 | rank (noun): a row of soldiers standing side by side | loc: sıra
  EN TS: Each rank is perfectly level.
  tr TS: Her sıra kusursuz hizada.
  EN FS: Each rank is a total mess.
  tr FS: Her sıra tam bir kaos.
  EN TP: ranks of saluting women
  tr TP: selam veren kadınlardan sıralar
  EN FP: ranks of running men
  tr FP: koşan erkeklerden sıralar
5235 | cargo (noun): goods carried by a large vehicle | loc: yük
  EN TS: She is stamping the cargo.
  tr TS: Yüke mühür basıyor.
  EN FS: She is painting the cargo.
  tr FS: Yükü boyuyor.
  EN TP: cargo at a container port
  tr TP: konteyner limanında yük
  EN FP: cargo at an airport
  tr FP: havalimanında yük
5236 | distance (noun): the space between two objects or points | loc: mesafe
  EN TS: The city is in the distance.
  tr TS: Şehir uzak mesafede görünüyor.
  EN FS: The camel is in the distance.
  tr FS: Deve uzak mesafede görünüyor.
  EN TP: towers in the distance
  tr TP: uzak mesafedeki kuleler
  EN FP: a long-distance call
  tr FP: uzun mesafeli bir telefon görüşmesi
5237 | star (noun): a body of hot gases that shines in the sky | loc: yıldız
  EN TS: Tea under a sky full of stars.
  tr TS: Yıldızlarla dolu bir gökyüzü altında çay.
  EN FS: Tea under a sky full of birds.
  tr FS: Kuşlarla dolu bir gökyüzü altında çay.
  EN TP: stars over a desert camp
  tr TP: çöl kampının üstünde yıldızlar
  EN FP: stars over a city
  tr FP: şehrin üstünde yıldızlar
5238 | dune (noun): a hill of sand shaped by the wind | loc: kum tepesi
  EN TS: Red dune selfie? Iconic.
  tr TS: Kırmızı kum tepesinde selfie? Efsane.
  EN FS: White dune selfie? Iconic.
  tr FS: Beyaz kum tepesinde selfie? Efsane.
  EN TP: a red dune selfie
  tr TP: kırmızı kum tepesinde selfie
  EN FP: a dune buggy ride
  tr FP: kum tepesinde buggy turu
5239 | release (noun): the act of setting someone or something free | loc: serbest bırakma
  EN TS: What a perfect release!
  tr TS: Ne kusursuz bir serbest bırakma!
  EN FS: What a perfect landing!
  tr FS: Ne kusursuz bir iniş!
  EN TP: the release of a falcon
  tr TP: bir şahini serbest bırakma
  EN FP: the release of an album
  tr FP: bir albümü piyasaya sürme
5240 | wing (noun): a movable body part used for flying | loc: kanat
  EN TS: The falcon's wings are open.
  tr TS: Şahinin kanatları açık.
  EN FS: The falcon's wings are closed.
  tr FS: Şahinin kanatları kapalı.
  EN TP: spreading both wings
  tr TP: iki kanadını açmak
  EN FP: chicken wings on a plate
  tr FP: tabakta tavuk kanatları
5241 | chamber (noun): an enclosed space, natural or man-made | loc: hazne
  EN TS: She is sliding into a chamber.
  tr TS: Kadın bir hazneye kayarak giriyor.
  EN FS: He is sliding into a chamber.
  tr FS: Adam bir hazneye kayarak giriyor.
  EN TP: a glowing medical chamber
  tr TP: parlayan tıbbi bir hazne
  EN FP: a chamber music concert
  tr FP: bir oda müziği konseri
5242 | elegant (adjective): graceful and stylish to look at | loc: şık
  EN TS: Her satin robe looks elegant.
  tr TS: Saten sabahlığı çok şık duruyor.
  EN FS: Her wool robe looks elegant.
  tr FS: Yün sabahlığı çok şık duruyor.
  EN TP: an elegant satin robe
  tr TP: şık bir saten sabahlık
  EN FP: an elegant evening party
  tr FP: şık bir akşam partisi
5243 | schedule (verb): to plan a time for an activity or event | loc: planlamak
  EN TS: She scheduled the whole month.
  tr TS: Bütün ayı planladı.
  EN FS: She scheduled the whole week.
  tr FS: Bütün haftayı planladı.
  EN TP: to schedule the whole month
  tr TP: bütün ayı planlamak
  EN FP: to schedule a meeting
  tr FP: bir toplantı planlamak
5244 | classmate (noun): a student in the same class at school as you | loc: sınıf arkadaşı
  EN TS: The classmates made a deal.
  tr TS: Sınıf arkadaşları anlaştı.
  EN FS: The teachers made a deal.
  tr FS: Öğretmenler anlaştı.
  EN TP: two classmates meeting
  tr TP: buluşan iki sınıf arkadaşı
  EN FP: a classmate's party
  tr FP: bir sınıf arkadaşının partisi
5245 | chemical (noun): material used in or made by a reaction | loc: kimyasal
  EN TS: The chemical glows purple!
  tr TS: Kimyasal mor mor parlıyor!
  EN FS: The chemical glows orange!
  tr FS: Kimyasal turuncu turuncu parlıyor!
  EN TP: a glowing purple chemical
  tr TP: mor parlayan bir kimyasal
  EN FP: a chemical in a tank
  tr FP: tanktaki bir kimyasal
5246 | flask (noun): a narrow-necked glass container for liquids | loc: cam şişe
  EN TS: She is holding a pink flask.
  tr TS: Elinde pembe bir cam şişe var.
  EN FS: She is holding a pink phone.
  tr FS: Elinde pembe bir telefon var.
  EN TP: a flask of blue liquid
  tr TP: mavi sıvılı bir cam şişe
  EN FP: a flask of hot tea
  tr FP: sıcak çaylı bir cam şişe
5247 | footprints (noun): the marks your feet leave on soft ground | loc: ayak izleri | translator note: Nonna rendered as Babaanne
  EN TS: Nonna is angry about the footprints.
  tr TS: Babaanne ayak izleri yüzünden çok kızgın.
  EN FS: Nonna is angry about the broken vase.
  tr FS: Babaanne kırık vazo yüzünden çok kızgın.
  EN TP: muddy footprints in a hall
  tr TP: koridorda çamurlu ayak izleri
  EN FP: muddy footprints in a garden
  tr FP: bahçede çamurlu ayak izleri
5248 | rent (noun): a payment you make to use something | loc: kira
  EN TS: She's paying the scooter rent.
  tr TS: Scooter kirasını ödüyor.
  EN FS: She's paying the bike rent.
  tr FS: Bisiklet kirasını ödüyor.
  EN TP: the rent for a scooter
  tr TP: scooter kirası
  EN FP: the rent for a flat
  tr FP: daire kirası
5249 | to wash (verb): to clean your body with soap and water | loc: yıkamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is washing a pan that has seen better days.
  tr TS: Eski günlerini arayan bir tavayı yıkıyor.
  EN FS: He is washing a cup that has seen better days.
  tr FS: Eski günlerini arayan bir fincanı yıkıyor.
  EN TP: washing a sooty pot
  tr TP: isli bir tencere yıkamak
  EN FP: washing his face
  tr FP: yüzünü yıkamak
5250 | call (noun): a telephone connection | loc: telefon görüşmesi
  EN TS: She is on a work call.
  tr TS: İşle ilgili bir telefon görüşmesinde.
  EN FS: She is on a video call.
  tr FS: Görüntülü bir görüşmede.
  EN TP: a desk phone call
  tr TP: masa telefonuyla bir görüşme
  EN FP: a laptop video call
  tr FP: laptopta görüntülü görüşme
5251 | type (verb): to write using a keyboard | loc: yazmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is typing and phoning!
  tr TS: Hem yazıyor hem telefonla konuşuyor!
  EN FS: She is typing and eating!
  tr FS: Hem yazıyor hem yemek yiyor!
  EN TP: typing while on the phone
  tr TP: telefondayken yazı yazmak
  EN FP: typing a text message
  tr FP: mesaj yazmak
5252 | tropical (adjective): from the hot wet regions near the equator | loc: tropikal
  EN TS: Tropical fruit is on sale.
  tr TS: Tropikal meyveler indirimde.
  EN FS: Frozen fruit is on sale.
  tr FS: Donmuş meyveler indirimde.
  EN TP: a pile of tropical fruit
  tr TP: bir yığın tropikal meyve
  EN FP: a tropical fish tank
  tr FP: tropikal balık akvaryumu
5253 | senior (adjective): older, or higher in rank than others | loc: yaşlı
  EN TS: These seniors dance better than me.
  tr TS: Bu yaşlılar benden iyi dans ediyor.
  EN FS: These seniors swim better than me.
  tr FS: Bu yaşlılar benden iyi yüzüyor.
  EN TP: senior dancers in the park
  tr TP: parkta dans eden yaşlılar
  EN FP: senior swimmers in the pool
  tr FP: havuzda yüzen yaşlılar
5254 | partner (noun): the person you are married to | loc: eş
  EN TS: Look at those partners dance!
  tr TS: Şu eşlerin dansına bak!
  EN FS: Look at those partners swim!
  tr FS: Şu eşlerin yüzüşüne bak!
  EN TP: dancing with a partner
  tr TP: eşiyle dans etmek
  EN FP: playing cards with a partner
  tr FP: eşiyle kâğıt oynamak
5255 | guilty (adjective): responsible for doing something wrong | loc: suçlu
  EN TS: He looks very guilty, and very shocked.
  tr TS: Adam çok suçlu ve çok şaşkın görünüyor.
  EN FS: She looks very guilty, and very shocked.
  tr FS: Kadın çok suçlu ve çok şaşkın görünüyor.
  EN TP: a guilty young man
  tr TP: suçlu bir genç adam
  EN FP: a guilty judge
  tr FP: suçlu bir hâkim
5256 | address (verb): to speak to a group of people | loc: hitap etmek
  EN TS: A judge is addressing them.
  tr TS: Bir hâkim onlara hitap ediyor.
  EN FS: A nurse is addressing them.
  tr FS: Bir hemşire onlara hitap ediyor.
  EN TP: addressing a packed hall
  tr TP: dolu bir salona hitap etmek
  EN FP: addressing a letter
  tr FP: bir mektuba adres yazmak
5257 | butler (noun): the head servant in a rich person's house | loc: baş uşak
  EN TS: The butler is carrying tea.
  tr TS: Baş uşak çay taşıyor.
  EN FS: The butler is carrying wine.
  tr FS: Baş uşak şarap taşıyor.
  EN TP: a butler carrying tea
  tr TP: çay taşıyan bir baş uşak
  EN FP: a butler opening the door
  tr FP: kapıyı açan bir baş uşak
5258 | bar (noun): a place where alcoholic drinks are served | loc: bar
  EN TS: Rooftop bar, shaker party!
  tr TS: Çatı barı, shaker partisi!
  EN FS: Basement bar, shaker party!
  tr FS: Bodrum barı, shaker partisi!
  EN TP: a rooftop bar at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında bir çatı barı
  EN FP: a bar of chocolate
  tr FP: bir kalıp çikolata
5259 | fur (noun): the soft thick hair covering an animal | loc: kürk
  EN TS: The big dog is shaking its wet fur. Everyone gets a shower.
  tr TS: Koca köpek ıslak kürkünü silkeliyor. Herkese bedava duş.
  EN FS: The big cat is shaking its wet fur. Everyone gets a shower.
  tr FS: Koca kedi ıslak kürkünü silkeliyor. Herkese bedava duş.
  EN TP: shaking its wet fur
  tr TP: ıslak kürkünü silkelemek
  EN FP: brushing its wet fur
  tr FP: ıslak kürkünü taramak
5260 | shame (noun): a painful feeling of guilt | loc: utanç
  EN TS: Caught with cake. The shame!
  tr TS: Pastayla yakalandı. Ne utanç!
  EN FS: Caught with pizza. The shame!
  tr FS: Pizzayla yakalandı. Ne utanç!
  EN TP: shame over a cake
  tr TP: pasta yüzünden utanç
  EN FP: shame over a broken plate
  tr FP: kırık tabak yüzünden utanç
5261 | share (noun): the part you get when something is divided | loc: pay
  EN TS: Even the jogger got a share!
  tr TS: Koşucu bile payını aldı!
  EN FS: Even the cyclist got a share!
  tr FS: Bisikletçi bile payını aldı!
  EN TP: a share of the pizza
  tr TP: pizzadan bir pay
  EN FP: a share of the company
  tr FP: şirketten bir pay
5262 | stable (adjective): not likely to change position or fall over | loc: sağlam
  EN TS: Such a "stable" shelf!
  tr TS: Ne "sağlam" bir raf ama!
  EN FS: Such a "stable" table!
  tr FS: Ne "sağlam" bir masa ama!
  EN TP: a not very stable shelf
  tr TP: pek sağlam olmayan bir raf
  EN FP: a stable wooden chair
  tr FP: sağlam bir ahşap sandalye
5263 | photograph (noun): a printed picture of a person or scene | loc: fotoğraf
  EN TS: A photograph is on the shelf.
  tr TS: Rafta bir fotoğraf var.
  EN FS: A mirror is on the shelf.
  tr FS: Rafta bir ayna var.
  EN TP: a framed family photograph
  tr TP: çerçeveli bir aile fotoğrafı
  EN FP: taking a family photograph
  tr FP: aile fotoğrafı çekmek
5264 | shift (verb): to change the place something is in | loc: yerini değiştirmek
  EN TS: She is shifting the sofa.
  tr TS: Kanepenin yerini değiştiriyor.
  EN FS: She is shifting the fridge.
  tr FS: Buzdolabının yerini değiştiriyor.
  EN TP: shifting furniture around
  tr TP: mobilyaların yerini değiştirmek
  EN FP: shifting gears in a car
  tr FP: arabada vites değiştirmek
5265 | container (noun): any object used to hold things | loc: konteyner
  EN TS: The ship carries containers.
  tr TS: Gemi konteyner taşıyor.
  EN FS: The ship carries cars.
  tr FS: Gemi araba taşıyor.
  EN TP: a ship with containers
  tr TP: konteynerli bir gemi
  EN FP: a truck with containers
  tr FP: konteynerli bir kamyon
5266 | telephone (noun): equipment you use to talk to someone far away | loc: telefon
  EN TS: She dropped the telephone!
  tr TS: Telefonu düşürdü!
  EN FS: She dropped the teacup!
  tr FS: Çay fincanını düşürdü!
  EN TP: a dropped telephone
  tr TP: yere düşmüş bir telefon
  EN FP: a telephone box
  tr FP: bir telefon kulübesi
5267 | gun (noun): a weapon that fires a bullet at high speed | loc: silah
  EN TS: Her gun is resting on a stand.
  tr TS: Silahı bir sehpanın üstünde duruyor.
  EN FS: Her gun is resting on a chair.
  tr FS: Silahı bir sandalyenin üstünde duruyor.
  EN TP: a gun on a stand
  tr TP: sehpa üstünde bir silah
  EN FP: a gun in a holster
  tr FP: kılıfta bir silah
5268 | rifle (noun): a long gun you hold with two hands | loc: tüfek
  EN TS: She's aiming her rifle.
  tr TS: Tüfeğiyle nişan alıyor.
  EN FS: She's cleaning her rifle.
  tr FS: Tüfeğini temizliyor.
  EN TP: shooting a rifle lying down
  tr TP: yüzüstü yatıp tüfekle atış
  EN FP: carrying a rifle on skis
  tr FP: sırtında tüfekle kayak
5269 | purchase (verb): to obtain or acquire something by paying | loc: satın almak
  EN TS: She purchased a coat.
  tr TS: Bir mont satın aldı.
  EN FS: She purchased a dress.
  tr FS: Bir elbise satın aldı.
  EN TP: purchasing an olive coat
  tr TP: zeytin yeşili bir mont satın almak
  EN FP: purchasing a new car
  tr FP: yeni bir araba satın almak
5270 | supermarket (noun): a big store selling food and household goods | loc: süpermarket
  EN TS: She is buying all the supermarket's cereal!
  tr TS: Süpermarketteki bütün mısır gevreklerini alıyor!
  EN FS: She is buying all the supermarket's soup!
  tr FS: Süpermarketteki bütün çorbaları alıyor!
  EN TP: a supermarket trolley
  tr TP: bir süpermarket arabası
  EN FP: a supermarket car park
  tr FP: bir süpermarket otoparkı
5271 | cry (noun): a loud shout or call | loc: haykırış
  EN TS: Their cry fills the canyon!
  tr TS: Haykırışları kanyonu dolduruyor!
  EN FS: Their song fills the canyon!
  tr FS: Şarkıları kanyonu dolduruyor!
  EN TP: a cry over the canyon
  tr TP: kanyonda bir haykırış
  EN FP: a cry for help
  tr FP: yardım için bir haykırış
5272 | hiker (noun): a person who walks long distances in nature | loc: yürüyüşçü
  EN TS: The hikers are going wild.
  tr TS: Yürüyüşçüler çılgına döndü.
  EN FS: The hikers are going home.
  tr FS: Yürüyüşçüler eve dönüyor.
  EN TP: hikers cheering at a canyon
  tr TP: kanyonda coşan yürüyüşçüler
  EN FP: hikers resting in a tent
  tr FP: çadırda dinlenen yürüyüşçüler
5273 | model (noun): a person who poses for a photographer | loc: manken
  EN TS: The model rocks green trousers.
  tr TS: Manken yeşil pantolonu fena taşıyor.
  EN FS: The model rocks orange trousers.
  tr FS: Manken turuncu pantolonu fena taşıyor.
  EN TP: a model on the runway
  tr TP: podyumda bir manken
  EN FP: a model of a plane
  tr FP: bir uçak maketi
5274 | soaked (adjective): completely wet, right through | loc: sırılsıklam
  EN TS: Shower on. Now he is soaked.
  tr TS: Duş açık. Şimdi sırılsıklam.
  EN FS: Shower off. Now he is soaked.
  tr FS: Duş kapalı. Şimdi sırılsıklam.
  EN TP: soaked in the shower
  tr TP: duşta sırılsıklam
  EN FP: soaked in the rain
  tr FP: yağmurda sırılsıklam
5275 | selfish (adjective): only concerned with yourself, not with others | loc: bencil
  EN TS: Two selfish kids, one remote.
  tr TS: İki bencil çocuk, tek kumanda.
  EN FS: Two selfish kids, one phone.
  tr FS: İki bencil çocuk, tek telefon.
  EN TP: selfish kids fighting
  tr TP: kavga eden bencil çocuklar
  EN FP: a selfish driver parking
  tr FP: park eden bencil bir sürücü
5276 | sibling (noun): your brother or your sister | loc: kardeş
  EN TS: One cookie, two siblings: war.
  tr TS: Bir kurabiye, iki kardeş: savaş.
  EN FS: One cake, two siblings: war.
  tr FS: Bir pasta, iki kardeş: savaş.
  EN TP: siblings building a den
  tr TP: battaniyeden kale yapan kardeşler
  EN FP: siblings doing homework
  tr FP: ödev yapan kardeşler
5277 | agree (verb): to be in agreement with someone | loc: hemfikir olmak
  EN TS: They agreed: half each.
  tr TS: Hemfikir oldular: yarı yarıya.
  EN FS: They agreed: all for him.
  tr FS: Hemfikir oldular: hepsi onun.
  EN TP: agreeing to share a cookie
  tr TP: kurabiyeyi paylaşmakta hemfikir olmak
  EN FP: agreeing to share a room
  tr FP: odayı paylaşmakta hemfikir olmak
5278 | corner (noun): the place where two streets meet | loc: köşe
  EN TS: Corner reached. Moving on.
  tr TS: Köşeye varıldı. Devam.
  EN FS: River reached. Moving on.
  tr FS: Nehre varıldı. Devam.
  EN TP: the corner of two streets
  tr TP: iki sokağın köşesi
  EN FP: a corner of the room
  tr FP: odanın bir köşesi
5279 | scroll (noun): a long rolled sheet covered in handwriting | loc: tomar
  EN TS: He is signing a giant scroll with a giant pen!
  tr TS: Dev bir kalemle dev bir tomarı imzalıyor!
  EN FS: He is signing a giant scroll with a tiny pen!
  tr FS: Minicik bir kalemle dev bir tomarı imzalıyor!
  EN TP: signing a giant scroll
  tr TP: dev bir tomarı imzalamak
  EN FP: reading an old scroll
  tr FP: eski bir tomarı okumak
5280 | signpost (noun): a post with arms that point the way | loc: yön levhası
  EN TS: She is reading the signpost.
  tr TS: Yön levhasını okuyor.
  EN FS: She is painting the signpost.
  tr FS: Yön levhasını boyuyor.
  EN TP: reading a wooden signpost
  tr TP: ahşap bir yön levhasını okumak
  EN FP: painting a wooden signpost
  tr FP: ahşap bir yön levhasını boyamak
5281 | star (noun): someone who is very skilled and famous | loc: yıldız
  EN TS: The star is singing on stage.
  tr TS: Yıldız sahnede şarkı söylüyor.
  EN FS: The star is dancing on stage.
  tr FS: Yıldız sahnede dans ediyor.
  EN TP: a star on stage
  tr TP: sahnede bir yıldız
  EN FP: a star in the sky
  tr FP: gökyüzünde bir yıldız
5282 | song (noun): a short piece of music with words | loc: şarkı
  EN TS: Everyone is singing a song.
  tr TS: Herkes bir şarkı söylüyor.
  EN FS: Everyone is writing a song.
  tr FS: Herkes bir şarkı yazıyor.
  EN TP: singing a song
  tr TP: şarkı söylemek
  EN FP: a song on the radio
  tr FP: radyoda bir şarkı
5283 | tower (noun): anything shaped like a tall column | loc: kule
  EN TS: It's just a small tower of plates.
  tr TS: Alt tarafı küçük bir tabak kulesi.
  EN FS: It's just a small tower of cups.
  tr FS: Alt tarafı küçük bir fincan kulesi.
  EN TP: a tower of plates
  tr TP: bir tabak kulesi
  EN FP: a tower of glasses
  tr FP: bir bardak kulesi
5284 | metal (adjective): made of metal | loc: metal
  EN TS: Love the metal armour, knight.
  tr TS: Metal zırhına bayıldım, şövalye.
  EN FS: Love the metal crown, knight.
  tr FS: Metal tacına bayıldım, şövalye.
  EN TP: a full metal suit
  tr TP: baştan aşağı metal bir zırh
  EN FP: a full metal band
  tr FP: baştan aşağı metal bir grup
5285 | happiness (noun): the feeling of joy and contentment | loc: mutluluk
  EN TS: Pure happiness in the garden.
  tr TS: Bahçede saf mutluluk.
  EN FS: Pure happiness in the kitchen.
  tr FS: Mutfakta saf mutluluk.
  EN TP: happiness in a sunny garden
  tr TP: güneşli bir bahçede mutluluk
  EN FP: happiness on a sunny beach
  tr FP: güneşli bir plajda mutluluk
5286 | sweatshirt (noun): a warm soft long-sleeved top, often oversized | loc: sweatshirt
  EN TS: They both want the sweatshirt!
  tr TS: İkisi de sweatshirt'ü istiyor!
  EN FS: They both want the teddy bear!
  tr FS: İkisi de oyuncak ayıyı istiyor!
  EN TP: pulling a lilac sweatshirt
  tr TP: lila bir sweatshirt'ü çekiştirmek
  EN FP: washing a lilac sweatshirt
  tr FP: lila bir sweatshirt'ü yıkamak
5287 | silence (noun): when no one is speaking | loc: sessizlik
  EN TS: Fifteen girls, zero silence!
  tr TS: On beş kız, sıfır sessizlik!
  EN FS: Fifteen boys, zero silence!
  tr FS: On beş oğlan, sıfır sessizlik!
  EN TP: a room without silence
  tr TP: sessizlik nedir bilmeyen bir oda
  EN FP: a minute of silence
  tr FP: bir dakikalık sessizlik
5288 | ski (noun): narrow runners used in pairs to glide on snow | loc: kayak
  EN TS: He is flying down on his skis!
  tr TS: Kayaklarıyla aşağı uçuyor!
  EN FS: He is flying down on his sled!
  tr FS: Kızağıyla aşağı uçuyor!
  EN TP: carving on skis
  tr TP: kayaklarla viraj almak
  EN FP: skis leaning on a wall
  tr FP: duvara dayalı kayaklar
5289 | moisture (noun): wetness caused by water | loc: nem
  EN TS: The skin lacks moisture.
  tr TS: Cilt nemden yoksun.
  EN FS: The skin lacks pores.
  tr FS: Cilt gözeneklerden yoksun.
  EN TP: skin without moisture
  tr TP: nemsiz bir cilt
  EN FP: moisture on a window
  tr FP: camda nem
5290 | skyscraper (noun): a very tall building with many floors | loc: gökdelen
  EN TS: What a tall skyscraper!
  tr TS: Ne yüksek bir gökdelen!
  EN FS: What a tall lighthouse!
  tr FS: Ne yüksek bir deniz feneri!
  EN TP: a spire-topped skyscraper
  tr TP: sivri tepeli bir gökdelen
  EN FP: a skyscraper being built
  tr FP: inşa halinde bir gökdelen
5291 | businessman (noun): a man who works in business, often in a suit | loc: iş adamı
  EN TS: Every businessman is sleeping.
  tr TS: Bütün iş adamları uyuyor.
  EN FS: Every businessman is reading.
  tr FS: Bütün iş adamları okuyor.
  EN TP: businessmen asleep on a plane
  tr TP: uçakta uyuyan iş adamları
  EN FP: businessmen asleep on a train
  tr FP: trende uyuyan iş adamları
5292 | productive (adjective): producing a lot of work | loc: üretken
  EN TS: Nobody here is very productive.
  tr TS: Burada kimse pek üretken değil.
  EN FS: Everybody here is very productive.
  tr FS: Burada herkes çok üretken.
  EN TP: not a productive day
  tr TP: pek üretken olmayan bir gün
  EN FP: a productive team meeting
  tr FP: üretken bir ekip toplantısı
5293 | glove (noun): the handwear used to catch a baseball | loc: eldiven
  EN TS: The ball is in his glove now.
  tr TS: Top artık eldiveninde.
  EN FS: The ball is in his cap now.
  tr FS: Top artık şapkasında.
  EN TP: a leather baseball glove
  tr TP: deri bir beyzbol eldiveni
  EN FP: a glove for the winter
  tr FP: kışlık bir eldiven
5294 | slippers (noun): soft warm shoes worn inside the house | loc: terlik
  EN TS: Her feet love the slippers.
  tr TS: Ayakları terliklere bayılıyor.
  EN FS: Her feet love the socks.
  tr FS: Ayakları çoraplara bayılıyor.
  EN TP: fluffy sheep slippers
  tr TP: tüylü koyun terlikler
  EN FP: slippers under the bed
  tr FP: yatağın altında terlikler
5295 | horn (noun): a thing you blow to make a loud noise | loc: boru
  EN TS: He is blowing a huge horn.
  tr TS: Kocaman bir boru üflüyor.
  EN FS: He is blowing a tiny horn.
  tr FS: Minicik bir boru üflüyor.
  EN TP: blowing a long horn
  tr TP: uzun bir boru üflemek
  EN FP: a horn on a sheep
  tr FP: koyunun boynuzu
5296 | traditional (adjective): done or worn as it was long ago | loc: geleneksel
  EN TS: He is making traditional food!
  tr TS: Geleneksel yemek yapıyor!
  EN FS: He is buying traditional food!
  tr FS: Geleneksel yemek satın alıyor!
  EN TP: cooking traditional food
  tr TP: geleneksel yemek pişirmek
  EN FP: a traditional dance
  tr FP: geleneksel bir dans
5297 | ruin (noun): a state of total destruction | loc: yıkım | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc yıkım means destruction; ruins = harabe
  EN TS: The old castle lies in ruins.
  tr TS: Eski kale harabeye dönmüş.
  EN FS: The old bridge lies in ruins.
  tr FS: Eski köprü harabeye dönmüş.
  EN TP: a castle in ruins
  tr TP: harabeye dönmüş bir kale
  EN FP: a castle in the snow
  tr FP: karlar altında bir kale
5298 | blazer (noun): a smart formal jacket worn over a shirt | loc: blazer ceket
  EN TS: Her blazer is beige.
  tr TS: Blazer ceketi bej.
  EN FS: Her blazer is black.
  tr FS: Blazer ceketi siyah.
  EN TP: a beige tailored blazer
  tr TP: bej, dar kesim bir blazer ceket
  EN FP: trying on a blazer
  tr FP: blazer ceket denemek
5299 | illegal (adjective): not allowed by law or the rules | loc: yasa dışı
  EN TS: Her sausages are illegal here!
  tr TS: Sucukları burada yasa dışı!
  EN FS: Her books are illegal here!
  tr FS: Kitapları burada yasa dışı!
  EN TP: illegal food in a suitcase
  tr TP: bavulda yasa dışı yiyecek
  EN FP: illegal parking at the airport
  tr FP: havalimanında yasa dışı park
5300 | threat (noun): something that is a source of danger | loc: tehdit
  EN TS: The viper is a real threat.
  tr TS: Engerek gerçek bir tehdit.
  EN FS: The lizard is a real threat.
  tr FS: Kertenkele gerçek bir tehdit.
  EN TP: a threat on the rocks
  tr TP: kayalarda bir tehdit
  EN FP: a threat in a letter
  tr FP: bir mektupta tehdit
5301 | allergy (noun): a bad body reaction to pollen or dust | loc: alerji
  EN TS: Her allergy hates this meadow.
  tr TS: Alerjisi bu çayırdan nefret ediyor.
  EN FS: Her allergy hates this beach.
  tr FS: Alerjisi bu plajdan nefret ediyor.
  EN TP: an allergy to pollen
  tr TP: polen alerjisi
  EN FP: an allergy to dogs
  tr FP: köpek alerjisi
5302 | blossom (noun): a flower on a tree, like cherry blossom | loc: çiçek
  EN TS: The blossoms made him sneeze!
  tr TS: Çiçekler onu hapşırttı!
  EN FS: The blossoms made him cry!
  tr FS: Çiçekler onu ağlattı!
  EN TP: sneezing under blossoms
  tr TP: çiçekli dallar altında hapşırmak
  EN FP: painting cherry blossoms
  tr FP: kiraz çiçekleri çizmek
5303 | snowflake (noun): a single small ice crystal that falls as snow | loc: kar tanesi
  EN TS: Snowflakes on her mitten.
  tr TS: Eldiveninde kar taneleri.
  EN FS: Snowflakes on her shoe.
  tr FS: Ayakkabısında kar taneleri.
  EN TP: a snowflake on a mitten
  tr TP: eldivende bir kar tanesi
  EN FP: a snowflake on a window
  tr FP: camda bir kar tanesi
5304 | dirt (noun): mud, dust or grime that makes something unclean | loc: kir
  EN TS: Ew! Dirt all over her hands!
  tr TS: İğrenç! Elleri kir içinde!
  EN FS: Ew! Paint all over her hands!
  tr FS: İğrenç! Elleri boya içinde!
  EN TP: dirt on her hands
  tr TP: ellerinde kir
  EN FP: dirt on her shoes
  tr FP: ayakkabılarında kir
5305 | society (noun): a large social group with its own culture | loc: toplum
  EN TS: Their society is hard at work.
  tr TS: Toplumları harıl harıl çalışıyor.
  EN FS: Their society is on holiday.
  tr FS: Toplumları tatilde.
  EN TP: a whole society at work
  tr TP: çalışan koca bir toplum
  EN FP: a society at a party
  tr FP: partideki bir toplum
5306 | comfortable (adjective): giving a feeling of physical well-being | loc: rahat
  EN TS: So comfortable on one sofa!
  tr TS: Tek kanepede ne kadar rahatlar!
  EN FS: So comfortable on one bed!
  tr FS: Tek yatakta ne kadar rahatlar!
  EN TP: comfortable on a full sofa
  tr TP: dolu bir kanepede rahat
  EN FP: comfortable in a big bed
  tr FP: büyük bir yatakta rahat
5307 | spacious (adjective): having a lot of open room inside | loc: ferah
  EN TS: The room is very spacious.
  tr TS: Oda çok ferah.
  EN FS: The room is very small.
  tr FS: Oda çok küçük.
  EN TP: a spacious living room
  tr TP: ferah bir oturma odası
  EN FP: a spacious car boot
  tr FP: ferah bir araba bagajı
5308 | sunflower (noun): a very tall flower with a big round yellow head | loc: ayçiçeği
  EN TS: A man brings her sunflowers.
  tr TS: Bir adam ona ayçiçekleri getiriyor.
  EN FS: A man brings her roses.
  tr FS: Bir adam ona güller getiriyor.
  EN TP: a bunch of sunflowers
  tr TP: bir demet ayçiçeği
  EN FP: a field of sunflowers
  tr FP: bir ayçiçeği tarlası
5309 | note (noun): a short written record | loc: not
  EN TS: Someone left her a sweet note.
  tr TS: Biri ona tatlı bir not bırakmış.
  EN FS: Someone left her a sad note.
  tr FS: Biri ona hüzünlü bir not bırakmış.
  EN TP: a note with a smiley
  tr TP: gülen yüzlü bir not
  EN FP: a note on the fridge
  tr FP: buzdolabında bir not
5310 | son (noun): a male child of his parents | loc: oğul | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A son is helping fix the car.
  tr TS: Oğlu arabayı tamir etmeye yardım ediyor.
  EN FS: A son is helping wash the car.
  tr FS: Oğlu arabayı yıkamaya yardım ediyor.
  EN TP: a son holding a spanner
  tr TP: elinde İngiliz anahtarıyla bir oğul
  EN FP: a son washing the car
  tr FP: arabayı yıkayan bir oğul
5311 | calm (adjective): quiet, relaxed and not worried at all | loc: sakin
  EN TS: Now the whole group is calm.
  tr TS: Artık bütün grup sakin.
  EN FS: Now the whole group is angry.
  tr FS: Artık bütün grup kızgın.
  EN TP: calm under blankets
  tr TP: battaniyelerin altında sakin
  EN FP: calm under pressure
  tr FP: baskı altında sakin
5312 | backyard (noun): the private grassy area behind a house | loc: arka bahçe
  EN TS: Backyard barbecue? Let's go!
  tr TS: Arka bahçede mangal? Gidiyoruz!
  EN FS: Backyard pool party? Let's go!
  tr FS: Arka bahçede havuz partisi? Gidiyoruz!
  EN TP: a barbecue in the backyard
  tr TP: arka bahçede mangal
  EN FP: a pool in the backyard
  tr FP: arka bahçede havuz
5313 | neon (adjective): glowing in bright electric colours | loc: neon
  EN TS: Neon signs cover every wall.
  tr TS: Her duvar neon tabelalarla kaplı.
  EN FS: Paper signs cover every wall.
  tr FS: Her duvar kâğıt tabelalarla kaplı.
  EN TP: glowing neon signs
  tr TP: parlayan neon tabelalar
  EN FP: neon lights in a club
  tr FP: kulüpte neon ışıklar
5314 | basket (noun): a woven container with handles | loc: sepet
  EN TS: Her basket holds all of Paris!
  tr TS: Sepetinde bütün Paris var!
  EN FS: Her bag holds all of Paris!
  tr FS: Çantasında bütün Paris var!
  EN TP: a basket of souvenirs
  tr TP: bir sepet hediyelik eşya
  EN FP: a basket of fruit
  tr FP: bir sepet meyve
5315 | postcard (noun): a card with a picture you write on and send | loc: kartpostal
  EN TS: She has a lot of postcards. For whom?
  tr TS: Bir sürü kartpostalı var. Kime acaba?
  EN FS: She has a lot of stamps. For whom?
  tr FS: Bir sürü pulu var. Kime acaba?
  EN TP: postcards of Paris
  tr TP: Paris kartpostalları
  EN FP: writing a postcard
  tr FP: kartpostal yazmak
5316 | curly (adjective): growing in curls instead of straight | loc: kıvırcık
  EN TS: Love her bouncy curly hair.
  tr TS: Zıp zıp kıvırcık saçlarına bayıldım.
  EN FS: Love her bouncy straight hair.
  tr FS: Zıp zıp düz saçlarına bayıldım.
  EN TP: tight curly dark hair
  tr TP: sık kıvırcık koyu saçlar
  EN FP: long curly blonde hair
  tr FP: uzun kıvırcık sarı saçlar
5317 | ruffle (noun): a strip of frilly fabric used as trim | loc: fırfır
  EN TS: Her ruffles are flying!
  tr TS: Fırfırları uçuşuyor!
  EN FS: Her shoes are flying!
  tr FS: Ayakkabıları uçuşuyor!
  EN TP: layers of red ruffles
  tr TP: kat kat kırmızı fırfırlar
  EN FP: ruffles on a shirt collar
  tr FP: gömlek yakasında fırfırlar
5318 | speak (verb): to express something in speech | loc: konuşmak
  EN TS: She is speaking to the public.
  tr TS: Halka hitaben konuşuyor.
  EN FS: She is singing to the public.
  tr FS: Halka şarkı söylüyor.
  EN TP: speaking into a microphone
  tr TP: mikrofona konuşmak
  EN FP: speaking on the phone
  tr FP: telefonda konuşmak
5319 | web (noun): a network formed by weaving threads | loc: ağ
  EN TS: The spider is below its web.
  tr TS: Örümcek ağının altında.
  EN FS: The spider is above its web.
  tr FS: Örümcek ağının üstünde.
  EN TP: a web between branches
  tr TP: dallar arasında bir ağ
  EN FP: a web in a corner
  tr FP: köşede bir ağ
5320 | demonstrate (verb): to show something to an audience | loc: göstermek
  EN TS: She is demonstrating a spine.
  tr TS: Bir omurga üzerinde gösteriyor.
  EN FS: She is demonstrating a heart.
  tr FS: Bir kalp üzerinde gösteriyor.
  EN TP: demonstrating on a spine model
  tr TP: omurga maketi üzerinde göstermek
  EN FP: demonstrating in the street
  tr FP: sokakta gösteri yapmak
5321 | skate (verb): to glide over ice wearing ice skates | loc: paten kaymak
  EN TS: He is skating like a pro.
  tr TS: Profesyonel gibi paten kayıyor.
  EN FS: He is skiing like a pro.
  tr FS: Profesyonel gibi kayak yapıyor.
  EN TP: skating on one leg
  tr TP: tek ayak üstünde paten kaymak
  EN FP: skating on a road
  tr FP: yolda paten kaymak
5322 | spit (verb): to force water or saliva out of your mouth | loc: tükürmek
  EN TS: Bad soup! He spat it out.
  tr TS: Çorba berbat! Tükürdü.
  EN FS: Bad tea! He spat it out.
  tr FS: Çay berbat! Tükürdü.
  EN TP: spitting out green soup
  tr TP: yeşil çorbayı tükürmek
  EN FP: spitting out a cherry stone
  tr FP: kiraz çekirdeği tükürmek
5323 | stone (noun): a lump or mass of hard rock | loc: taş
  EN TS: That stone made a big splash.
  tr TS: O taş suyu fena sıçrattı.
  EN FS: That boat made a big splash.
  tr FS: O tekne suyu fena sıçrattı.
  EN TP: throwing a big stone
  tr TP: büyük bir taş fırlatmak
  EN FP: skimming a flat stone
  tr FP: yassı taş sektirmek
5324 | sponge (noun): a soft object with holes used for washing | loc: sünger
  EN TS: The sponge beat the sauce!
  tr TS: Sünger sosu yendi!
  EN FS: The sponge beat the cheese!
  tr FS: Sünger peyniri yendi!
  EN TP: a soapy sponge
  tr TP: köpüklü bir sünger
  EN FP: a sponge cake
  tr FP: bir sünger kek
5325 | spouse (noun): a person's partner in marriage | loc: eş
  EN TS: The spouses signed a document.
  tr TS: Eşler bir belge imzaladı.
  EN FS: The spouses burned a document.
  tr FS: Eşler bir belge yaktı.
  EN TP: spouses signing papers
  tr TP: evrak imzalayan eşler
  EN FP: spouses arguing at home
  tr FP: evde tartışan eşler
5326 | coach (noun): someone in charge of training an athlete or team | loc: antrenör
  EN TS: The coach is taping her ankle.
  tr TS: Antrenör ayak bileğine bant sarıyor.
  EN FS: The coach is taping her wrist.
  tr FS: Antrenör el bileğine bant sarıyor.
  EN TP: a coach helping a gymnast
  tr TP: jimnastikçiye yardım eden antrenör
  EN FP: a coach shouting at players
  tr FP: oyunculara bağıran antrenör
5327 | cape (noun): a loose sleeveless coat hanging from the shoulders | loc: pelerin
  EN TS: The client wears a black cape.
  tr TS: Müşteri siyah bir pelerin giymiş.
  EN FS: The client wears a white cape.
  tr FS: Müşteri beyaz bir pelerin giymiş.
  EN TP: a black salon cape
  tr TP: siyah bir kuaför pelerini
  EN FP: a superhero cape
  tr FP: bir süper kahraman pelerini
5328 | blouse (noun): a loose light shirt worn by women | loc: bluz
  EN TS: She is sniffing a peach blouse.
  tr TS: Şeftali rengi bir bluzu kokluyor.
  EN FS: She is sniffing a white blouse.
  tr FS: Beyaz bir bluzu kokluyor.
  EN TP: a peach ruffled blouse
  tr TP: fırfırlı şeftali rengi bir bluz
  EN FP: ironing a peach blouse
  tr FP: şeftali rengi bir bluz ütülemek
5329 | seed (noun): the small hard part that grows into a plant | loc: tohum
  EN TS: The seed has a tiny root!
  tr TS: Tohumun minik bir kökü var!
  EN FS: The seed has a tiny flower!
  tr FS: Tohumun minik bir çiçeği var!
  EN TP: a seed with a root
  tr TP: kök salmış bir tohum
  EN FP: a seed in a beak
  tr FP: gagada bir tohum
5330 | spy (noun): a person who secretly finds out information | loc: casus
  EN TS: The "secret" spy has a hole in his newspaper.
  tr TS: "Gizli" casusun gazetesinde bir delik var.
  EN FS: The "secret" spy has a hole in his hat.
  tr FS: "Gizli" casusun şapkasında bir delik var.
  EN TP: a spy behind a newspaper
  tr TP: gazetenin arkasında bir casus
  EN FP: a spy behind a door
  tr FP: kapının arkasında bir casus
5331 | fitness (noun): good physical condition | loc: kondisyon
  EN TS: Her fitness? She crushes watermelons!
  tr TS: Kondisyonu mu? Karpuzları eziyor!
  EN FS: Her fitness? She crushes coconuts!
  tr FS: Kondisyonu mu? Hindistan cevizlerini eziyor!
  EN TP: fitness at a beach bar
  tr TP: plaj barında kondisyon
  EN FP: a fitness app
  tr FP: bir kondisyon uygulaması
5332 | unity (noun): being one undivided whole | loc: birlik
  EN TS: The staff shows strong unity.
  tr TS: Personel güçlü bir birlik gösteriyor.
  EN FS: The guests show strong unity.
  tr FS: Misafirler güçlü bir birlik gösteriyor.
  EN TP: the unity of the team
  tr TP: ekibin birliği
  EN FP: the unity of the country
  tr FP: ülkenin birliği
5333 | staircase (noun): a set of stairs inside a building | loc: merdiven
  EN TS: Each staircase is fancier!
  tr TS: Her merdiven bir öncekinden daha gösterişli!
  EN FS: Each staircase is dirtier!
  tr FS: Her merdiven bir öncekinden daha kirli!
  EN TP: a grand marble staircase
  tr TP: görkemli bir mermer merdiven
  EN FP: a staircase in a lighthouse
  tr FP: deniz fenerinde bir merdiven
5334 | respect (verb): to show respect towards someone | loc: saygı göstermek
  EN TS: The fans respect this moment.
  tr TS: Taraftarlar bu ana saygı gösteriyor.
  EN FS: The fans ignore this moment.
  tr FS: Taraftarlar bu anı umursamıyor.
  EN TP: respecting the moment
  tr TP: ana saygı göstermek
  EN FP: respecting the speed limit
  tr FP: hız sınırına saygı göstermek
5335 | enthusiastic (adjective): showing great excitement and interest | loc: coşkulu
  EN TS: She is an enthusiastic fan.
  tr TS: Coşkulu bir taraftar.
  EN FS: She is an enthusiastic player.
  tr FS: Coşkulu bir oyuncu.
  EN TP: an enthusiastic football fan
  tr TP: coşkulu bir futbol taraftarı
  EN FP: an enthusiastic tennis fan
  tr FP: coşkulu bir tenis hayranı
5336 | loyalty (noun): the quality of being loyal | loc: sadakat
  EN TS: His cap shows his loyalty.
  tr TS: Şapkası sadakatini gösteriyor.
  EN FS: His scarf shows his loyalty.
  tr FS: Atkısı sadakatini gösteriyor.
  EN TP: loyalty to the club
  tr TP: kulübe sadakat
  EN FP: loyalty to the king
  tr FP: krala sadakat
5337 | rail (noun): the railway, the train system | loc: demiryolu
  EN TS: Croissant in mouth, he is travelling by rail.
  tr TS: Ağzında kruvasan, demiryoluyla seyahat ediyor.
  EN FS: Pizza in mouth, he is travelling by rail.
  tr FS: Ağzında pizza, demiryoluyla seyahat ediyor.
  EN TP: travelling by rail
  tr TP: demiryoluyla seyahat
  EN FP: travelling by air
  tr FP: havayoluyla seyahat
5338 | stay (verb): to stay put in one certain place | loc: kalmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: You can stay for 10 euros or for 10,000 euros.
  tr TS: 10 euroya da kalabilirsin, 10.000 euroya da.
  EN FS: You can stay for 10 euros or for 1,000 euros.
  tr FS: 10 euroya da kalabilirsin, 1.000 euroya da.
  EN TP: staying in a hostel
  tr TP: hostelde kalmak
  EN FP: staying at home
  tr FP: evde kalmak
5339 | control (verb): to handle a machine and make it function | loc: kullanmak
  EN TS: She is controlling a bus.
  tr TS: Bir otobüs kullanıyor.
  EN FS: She is controlling a tram.
  tr FS: Bir tramvay kullanıyor.
  EN TP: controlling a city bus
  tr TP: şehir otobüsü kullanmak
  EN FP: controlling a drone
  tr FP: drone kullanmak
5340 | garage (noun): a building where a car is kept | loc: garaj
  EN TS: A box is going to the garage.
  tr TS: Bir kutu garaja gidiyor.
  EN FS: A box is going to the car.
  tr FS: Bir kutu arabaya gidiyor.
  EN TP: an open garage
  tr TP: açık bir garaj
  EN FP: a garage full of cars
  tr FP: arabalarla dolu bir garaj
5341 | nail (verb): to attach something with nails | loc: çivilemek
  EN TS: The boy is nailing a plank.
  tr TS: Çocuk bir tahtayı çiviliyor.
  EN FS: The boy is painting a plank.
  tr FS: Çocuk bir tahtayı boyuyor.
  EN TP: nailing a plank
  tr TP: tahta çivilemek
  EN FP: nailing a poster
  tr FP: poster çivilemek
5342 | tongue (noun): the soft muscular part inside your mouth | loc: dil
  EN TS: Frosting on her tongue. Yum!
  tr TS: Dilinde krema. Nefis!
  EN FS: Ketchup on her tongue. Yum!
  tr FS: Dilinde ketçap. Nefis!
  EN TP: frosting on her tongue
  tr TP: dilinde krema
  EN FP: burning her tongue on tea
  tr FP: çayla dilini yakmak
5343 | twin (adjective): being two identical ones that match | loc: ikiz
  EN TS: The girls have twin beds.
  tr TS: Kızların ikiz yatakları var.
  EN FS: The girls have bunk beds.
  tr FS: Kızların ranzası var.
  EN TP: two matching twin beds
  tr TP: iki eş ikiz yatak
  EN FP: a hotel twin room
  tr FP: otelde iki yataklı oda
5344 | quilt (noun): a warm cover sewn from many pieces of cloth | loc: yorgan
  EN TS: They made a big quilt!
  tr TS: Kocaman bir yorgan yaptılar!
  EN FS: They made a big flag!
  tr FS: Kocaman bir bayrak yaptılar!
  EN TP: a finished patchwork quilt
  tr TP: bitmiş bir kırkyama yorgan
  EN FP: a quilt on a bed
  tr FP: yatakta bir yorgan
5345 | lean (verb): to rest your body sideways on something | loc: yaslanmak
  EN TS: She is leaning on the railing.
  tr TS: Korkuluğa yaslanıyor.
  EN FS: She is leaning on a tree.
  tr FS: Bir ağaca yaslanıyor.
  EN TP: leaning on a bridge railing
  tr TP: köprü korkuluğuna yaslanmak
  EN FP: leaning on a garden fence
  tr FP: bahçe çitine yaslanmak
5346 | stomach (noun): the muscular organ that holds the food you eat | loc: mide
  EN TS: He is patting his stomach.
  tr TS: Midesini sıvazlıyor.
  EN FS: He is patting his head.
  tr FS: Kafasını sıvazlıyor.
  EN TP: a full stomach
  tr TP: dolu bir mide
  EN FP: a stomach full of soup
  tr FP: çorbayla dolu bir mide
5347 | stop (noun): the act of stopping something | loc: duruş
  EN TS: Traffic is coming to a stop.
  tr TS: Trafik tam duruşa geçiyor.
  EN FS: Trains are coming to a stop.
  tr FS: Trenler tam duruşa geçiyor.
  EN TP: a stop for the traffic
  tr TP: trafik için bir duruş
  EN FP: a stop for a coffee
  tr FP: kahve için bir duruş
5348 | thank (verb): to express gratitude to someone | loc: teşekkür etmek
  EN TS: She is thanking the man with the umbrella.
  tr TS: Şemsiyeli adama teşekkür ediyor.
  EN FS: She is thanking the man with the dog.
  tr FS: Köpekli adama teşekkür ediyor.
  EN TP: to thank a kind stranger
  tr TP: nazik bir yabancıya teşekkür etmek
  EN FP: to thank the bus driver
  tr FP: otobüs şoförüne teşekkür etmek
5349 | award (verb): to give something as an honor or reward | loc: ödüllendirmek
  EN TS: She is awarding yet another medal!
  tr TS: Bir madalyayla daha ödüllendiriyor!
  EN FS: She is awarding yet another trophy!
  tr FS: Bir kupayla daha ödüllendiriyor!
  EN TP: awarding a medal
  tr TP: madalyayla ödüllendirmek
  EN FP: awarding a song prize
  tr FP: şarkı ödülüyle ödüllendirmek
5350 | creek (noun): a small natural stream of water | loc: dere
  EN TS: Mid-air over the creek. Brave!
  tr TS: Derenin üstünde havada. Cesur!
  EN FS: Mid-air over the lake. Brave!
  tr FS: Gölün üstünde havada. Cesur!
  EN TP: jumping across a creek
  tr TP: dereden atlamak
  EN FP: swimming in a creek
  tr FP: derede yüzmek
5351 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: sokak lambası
  EN TS: Orange streetlights, so cozy.
  tr TS: Turuncu sokak lambaları, ne sıcacık.
  EN FS: Blue streetlights, so cozy.
  tr FS: Mavi sokak lambaları, ne sıcacık.
  EN TP: a row of streetlights
  tr TP: bir sıra sokak lambası
  EN FP: a broken streetlight
  tr FP: bozuk bir sokak lambası
5352 | frustration (noun): the feeling of being blocked from your goals | loc: hüsran
  EN TS: Her frustration is at 1000 %.
  tr TS: Hüsranı %1000'de.
  EN FS: Her frustration is at 0 %.
  tr FS: Hüsranı %0'da.
  EN TP: frustration at a laptop
  tr TP: laptop başında hüsran
  EN FP: frustration at a teacher
  tr FP: öğretmene karşı hüsran
5353 | paperwork (noun): work that means handling forms and papers | loc: evrak işi
  EN TS: The paperwork is winning.
  tr TS: Evrak işi kazanıyor.
  EN FS: The paperwork is shrinking.
  tr FS: Evrak işi azalıyor.
  EN TP: towers of paperwork
  tr TP: kule kule evrak işi
  EN FP: paperwork on a laptop
  tr FP: laptopta evrak işi
5354 | class (noun): teaching given as a series of lessons | loc: sınıf
  EN TS: The class follows her well.
  tr TS: Sınıf kadın eğitmeni iyi takip ediyor.
  EN FS: The class follows him well.
  tr FS: Sınıf erkek eğitmeni iyi takip ediyor.
  EN TP: a class in the park
  tr TP: parkta bir sınıf
  EN FP: a class in a school
  tr FP: okulda bir sınıf
5355 | trainer (noun): someone who trains other people or animals | loc: antrenör
  EN TS: Even the cat copies the trainer!
  tr TS: Kedi bile antrenörü taklit ediyor!
  EN FS: Even the dog copies the trainer!
  tr FS: Köpek bile antrenörü taklit ediyor!
  EN TP: a trainer in the park
  tr TP: parkta bir antrenör
  EN FP: a dog trainer with treats
  tr FP: ödül mamalı bir köpek eğitmeni
5356 | yoga (noun): calm stretching poses with slow breathing | loc: yoga
  EN TS: Rooftop yoga at sunset: goals.
  tr TS: Gün batımında çatıda yoga: hedef.
  EN FS: Beach yoga at sunset: goals.
  tr FS: Gün batımında plajda yoga: hedef.
  EN TP: yoga on a rooftop
  tr TP: çatıda yoga
  EN FP: yoga in a gym class
  tr FP: spor salonunda yoga dersi
5357 | fancy (adjective): decorated, expensive-looking and not plain | loc: gösterişli
  EN TS: The dog has a fancier stroller than most babies.
  tr TS: Köpeğin bebek arabası çoğu bebeğinkinden daha gösterişli.
  EN FS: The cat has a fancier stroller than most babies.
  tr FS: Kedinin bebek arabası çoğu bebeğinkinden daha gösterişli.
  EN TP: a fancy chrome stroller
  tr TP: gösterişli krom bir bebek arabası
  EN FP: a fancy dress party
  tr FP: gösterişli bir kostüm partisi
5358 | peek (verb): to take a quick secret look from hiding | loc: gizlice bakmak
  EN TS: She is peeking through books.
  tr TS: Kitapların arasından gizlice bakıyor.
  EN FS: She is peeking through blinds.
  tr FS: Panjurların arasından gizlice bakıyor.
  EN TP: peeking through a gap
  tr TP: bir aralıktan gizlice bakmak
  EN FP: peeking inside a book
  tr FP: bir kitabın içine gizlice bakmak
5359 | hippo (noun): a very big grey animal that lives in rivers | loc: su aygırı
  EN TS: The hippo is hiding from her.
  tr TS: Su aygırı ondan saklanıyor.
  EN FS: The duck is hiding from her.
  tr FS: Ördek ondan saklanıyor.
  EN TP: a hippo in the river
  tr TP: nehirde bir su aygırı
  EN FP: a hippo on the jetty
  tr FP: iskelede bir su aygırı
5360 | metro (noun): an electric railway that runs below the ground | loc: metro
  EN TS: The metro is "a bit" busy.
  tr TS: Metro "biraz" kalabalık.
  EN FS: The metro is "a bit" empty.
  tr FS: Metro "biraz" boş.
  EN TP: a packed metro station
  tr TP: tıklım tıklım bir metro istasyonu
  EN FP: an empty metro station
  tr FP: bomboş bir metro istasyonu
5361 | easy (adjective): needing little effort, not difficult | loc: kolay
  EN TS: Six bags are "easy" to push.
  tr TS: Altı çantayı itmek "kolay".
  EN FS: Six boxes are "easy" to push.
  tr FS: Altı kutuyu itmek "kolay".
  EN TP: not an easy trip
  tr TP: hiç kolay olmayan bir yolculuk
  EN FP: not an easy exam
  tr FP: hiç kolay olmayan bir sınav
5362 | silly (adjective): foolish in a funny, ludicrous way | loc: saçma
  EN TS: The silliest glasses on the island!
  tr TS: Adadaki en saçma gözlük!
  EN FS: The silliest hat on the island!
  tr FS: Adadaki en saçma şapka!
  EN TP: silly heart sunglasses
  tr TP: saçma kalpli güneş gözlüğü
  EN FP: silly heart balloons
  tr FP: saçma kalpli balonlar
5363 | aid (verb): to give help to someone | loc: yardım etmek
  EN TS: They are aiding the runner.
  tr TS: Koşucuya yardım ediyorlar.
  EN FS: They are aiding the cyclist.
  tr FS: Bisikletçiye yardım ediyorlar.
  EN TP: aiding an exhausted runner
  tr TP: bitkin bir koşucuya yardım etmek
  EN FP: aiding a lost tourist
  tr FP: kaybolmuş bir turiste yardım etmek
5364 | assist (verb): to give someone help with something | loc: yardımcı olmak
  EN TS: Two heroes are assisting her!
  tr TS: İki kahraman ona yardımcı oluyor!
  EN FS: Two nurses are assisting her!
  tr FS: İki hemşire ona yardımcı oluyor!
  EN TP: assisting a tired runner
  tr TP: yorgun bir koşucuya yardımcı olmak
  EN FP: assisting a tired driver
  tr FP: yorgun bir sürücüye yardımcı olmak
5365 | weapon (noun): an instrument used in fighting or hunting | loc: silah
  EN TS: He is lowering his weapon.
  tr TS: Silahını indiriyor.
  EN FS: He is cleaning his weapon.
  tr FS: Silahını temizliyor.
  EN TP: lowering a paintball weapon
  tr TP: paintball silahını indirmek
  EN FP: loading a paintball weapon
  tr FP: paintball silahını doldurmak
5366 | surrender (verb): to give up to the power of another | loc: teslim olmak
  EN TS: He is surrendering!
  tr TS: Teslim oluyor!
  EN FS: He is attacking!
  tr FS: Saldırıyor!
  EN TP: surrendering with raised hands
  tr TP: elleri havada teslim olmak
  EN FP: surrendering his passport
  tr FP: pasaportunu teslim etmek
5367 | stuff (verb): to cram something into a tight space | loc: tıkıştırmak
  EN TS: She is stuffing her mouth!
  tr TS: Ağzına tıkıştırıyor!
  EN FS: She is stuffing her bag!
  tr FS: Çantasına tıkıştırıyor!
  EN TP: stuffing in a cheeseburger
  tr TP: çizburgeri ağzına tıkıştırmak
  EN FP: stuffing a turkey
  tr FP: hindinin içini doldurmak
5368 | suffer (verb): to be subjected to something bad | loc: acı çekmek
  EN TS: The heat makes them suffer.
  tr TS: Sıcaktan acı çekiyorlar.
  EN FS: The cold makes them suffer.
  tr FS: Soğuktan acı çekiyorlar.
  EN TP: suffering in the heat
  tr TP: sıcakta acı çekmek
  EN FP: suffering from a cold
  tr FP: soğuk algınlığıyla acı çekmek
5369 | tough (adjective): not given to gentleness or soft feelings | loc: sert
  EN TS: Tough boxer, soaked in sweat.
  tr TS: Sert boksör, terden sırılsıklam.
  EN FS: Tough boxer, soaked in rain.
  tr FS: Sert boksör, yağmurdan sırılsıklam.
  EN TP: a tough young boxer
  tr TP: sert, genç bir boksör
  EN FP: a tough piece of meat
  tr FP: sert bir et parçası
5370 | canoe (noun): a narrow boat you move with a paddle | loc: kano
  EN TS: He is paddling a yellow canoe.
  tr TS: Sarı bir kanoyla kürek çekiyor.
  EN FS: He is paddling a red canoe.
  tr FS: Kırmızı bir kanoyla kürek çekiyor.
  EN TP: paddling a yellow canoe
  tr TP: sarı bir kanoyla kürek çekmek
  EN FP: carrying a canoe home
  tr FP: kanoyu eve taşımak
5371 | garland (noun): a chain of flowers worn or hung as decoration | loc: çelenk
  EN TS: They look cool in flower garlands.
  tr TS: Çiçek çelenkleriyle çok havalılar.
  EN FS: They look cool in paper crowns.
  tr FS: Kâğıt taçlarla çok havalılar.
  EN TP: wearing flower garlands
  tr TP: çiçek çelengi takmak
  EN FP: hanging a garland indoors
  tr FP: içeriye çelenk asmak
5372 | broom (noun): a brush with a long handle for sweeping floors | loc: süpürge
  EN TS: His broom is pushing leaves.
  tr TS: Süpürgesi yaprakları itiyor.
  EN FS: His broom is pushing snow.
  tr FS: Süpürgesi karı itiyor.
  EN TP: a broom and dry leaves
  tr TP: bir süpürge ve kuru yapraklar
  EN FP: a broom in the kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta bir süpürge
5373 | expand (verb): to become larger in size or volume | loc: genişlemek
  EN TS: Everything is expanding!
  tr TS: Her şey genişliyor!
  EN FS: Everything is shrinking!
  tr FS: Her şey küçülüyor!
  EN TP: a bouncy castle expanding
  tr TP: genişleyen bir şişme kale
  EN FP: a business expanding abroad
  tr FP: yurt dışına genişleyen bir şirket
5374 | shallow (adjective): not deep, lacking much depth | loc: sığ
  EN TS: The water is a bit shallow.
  tr TS: Su biraz sığ.
  EN FS: The water is a bit deep.
  tr FS: Su biraz derin.
  EN TP: swimming in shallow water
  tr TP: sığ suda yüzmek
  EN FP: a shallow soup bowl
  tr FP: sığ bir çorba kâsesi
5375 | swing (verb): to move something in a curve or arc to hit | loc: savurmak
  EN TS: She is swinging like a pro.
  tr TS: Profesyonel gibi savuruyor.
  EN FS: She is swimming like a pro.
  tr FS: Profesyonel gibi yüzüyor.
  EN TP: swinging a golf club
  tr TP: golf sopası savurmak
  EN FP: swinging a baseball bat
  tr FP: beyzbol sopası savurmak
5376 | switch (noun): a device that turns the electricity on or off | loc: ışık düğmesi
  EN TS: He pressed the switch. Light!
  tr TS: Işık düğmesine bastı. Işık!
  EN FS: He kicked the switch. Light!
  tr FS: Işık düğmesine tekme attı. Işık!
  EN TP: pressing a light switch
  tr TP: ışık düğmesine basmak
  EN FP: a switch on a railway
  tr FP: demiryolunda bir makas
5377 | collect (verb): to gather things together into one place | loc: toplamak
  EN TS: She collected the plates.
  tr TS: Tabakları topladı.
  EN FS: She collected the apples.
  tr FS: Elmaları topladı.
  EN TP: collected dirty plates
  tr TP: toplanmış kirli tabaklar
  EN FP: collecting red apples
  tr FP: kırmızı elma toplamak
5378 | set (verb): to put something down in a certain place | loc: koymak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is setting the table.
  tr TS: Sofraya tabakları koyuyor.
  EN FS: She is setting the alarm.
  tr FS: Telefona alarm koyuyor.
  EN TP: to set the table
  tr TP: sofraya tabak koymak
  EN FP: to set an alarm
  tr FP: alarm koymak
5379 | alter (verb): to change something to make it different | loc: değiştirmek
  EN TS: The tailor altered the jacket.
  tr TS: Terzi ceketi baştan değiştirdi.
  EN FS: The tailor altered the shirt.
  tr FS: Terzi gömleği baştan değiştirdi.
  EN TP: altering a navy jacket
  tr TP: lacivert bir ceketi değiştirmek
  EN FP: altering the travel plans
  tr FP: seyahat planlarını değiştirmek
5380 | take (verb): to get something into your hands | loc: almak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He even took the box!
  tr TS: Adam kutuyu bile aldı!
  EN FS: She even took the box!
  tr FS: Kadın kutuyu bile aldı!
  EN TP: taking stuff from a box
  tr TP: kutudan bir şeyler almak
  EN FP: taking a box to school
  tr FP: kutuyu okula götürmek
5381 | conversation (noun): an informal exchange of ideas by speaking | loc: sohbet
  EN TS: Coffee and a big conversation.
  tr TS: Kahve ve koyu bir sohbet.
  EN FS: Beer and a big conversation.
  tr FS: Bira ve koyu bir sohbet.
  EN TP: a conversation over coffee
  tr TP: kahve eşliğinde sohbet
  EN FP: a conversation by email
  tr FP: e-postayla sohbet
5382 | discuss (verb): to talk about something and examine it | loc: tartışmak
  EN TS: Everyone at the table is discussing it at once!
  tr TS: Masadaki herkes aynı anda tartışıyor!
  EN FS: Everyone on the bus is discussing it at once!
  tr FS: Otobüsteki herkes aynı anda tartışıyor!
  EN TP: discussing at a cafe table
  tr TP: kafe masasında tartışmak
  EN FP: discussing it by phone
  tr FP: telefonda tartışmak
5383 | avenue (noun): a wide street in a town | loc: cadde
  EN TS: So many taxis on the avenue!
  tr TS: Caddede ne çok taksi var!
  EN FS: So many buses on the avenue!
  tr FS: Caddede ne çok otobüs var!
  EN TP: a wide avenue of taxis
  tr TP: taksilerle dolu geniş bir cadde
  EN FP: an avenue of old trees
  tr FP: yaşlı ağaçlarla dolu bir cadde
5384 | champion (noun): someone who won first place in a competition | loc: şampiyon
  EN TS: The champions are going wild.
  tr TS: Şampiyonlar çılgına döndü.
  EN FS: The champions are going home.
  tr FS: Şampiyonlar eve dönüyor.
  EN TP: champions in striped shirts
  tr TP: çizgili formalı şampiyonlar
  EN FP: a champion on a podium
  tr FP: kürsüde bir şampiyon
5385 | win (noun): a victory in a race or a competition | loc: galibiyet
  EN TS: The rally ends in a win.
  tr TS: Ralli galibiyetle bitiyor.
  EN FS: The rally ends in a loss.
  tr FS: Ralli yenilgiyle bitiyor.
  EN TP: a beach volleyball win
  tr TP: plaj voleybolunda galibiyet
  EN FP: a win at cards
  tr FP: kâğıt oyununda galibiyet
5386 | tear (verb): to separate something by pulling it apart | loc: yırtmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is tearing the contract.
  tr TS: Sözleşmeyi yırtıyor.
  EN FS: She is tearing the curtains.
  tr FS: Perdeleri yırtıyor.
  EN TP: tearing a contract in half
  tr TP: sözleşmeyi ikiye yırtmak
  EN FP: tearing pages from a book
  tr FP: kitaptan sayfa yırtmak
5387 | sorrow (noun): deep sadness, especially about a loss | loc: keder
  EN TS: They share their sorrow.
  tr TS: Kederlerini paylaşıyorlar.
  EN FS: They share their pizza.
  tr FS: Pizzalarını paylaşıyorlar.
  EN TP: sorrow on a sofa
  tr TP: kanepede keder
  EN FP: sorrow at a funeral
  tr FP: cenazede keder
5388 | packet (noun): things wrapped together in one package | loc: paket
  EN TS: She won the packet of crisps!
  tr TS: Cips paketini o kazandı!
  EN FS: She won the packet of sweets!
  tr FS: Şeker paketini o kazandı!
  EN TP: grabbing a packet of crisps
  tr TP: cips paketini kapmak
  EN FP: a packet of seeds
  tr FP: bir paket tohum
5389 | dodge (verb): to make a sudden move to avoid something | loc: sıyrılmak
  EN TS: He is dodging her like Messi.
  tr TS: Oğlan Messi gibi kızdan sıyrılıyor.
  EN FS: She is dodging him like Messi.
  tr FS: Kız Messi gibi oğlandan sıyrılıyor.
  EN TP: dodging her hands
  tr TP: kızın ellerinden sıyrılmak
  EN FP: dodging a football
  tr FP: bir futbol topundan sıyrılmak
5390 | youth (noun): a young person, especially a young man or boy | loc: genç
  EN TS: A youth is skating, so cool.
  tr TS: Bir genç kaykay yapıyor, çok havalı.
  EN FS: A youth is cycling, so cool.
  tr FS: Bir genç bisiklet sürüyor, çok havalı.
  EN TP: a youth on a skateboard
  tr TP: kaykaylı bir genç
  EN FP: a youth on a bicycle
  tr FP: bisikletli bir genç
5391 | stare (verb): to look at something for a long time | loc: dik dik bakmak
  EN TS: Nice sunset, they're staring at a phone.
  tr TS: Gün batımı şahane, onlar telefona dik dik bakıyor.
  EN FS: Nice sunset, they're staring at a book.
  tr FS: Gün batımı şahane, onlar kitaba dik dik bakıyor.
  EN TP: staring at a phone
  tr TP: telefona dik dik bakmak
  EN FP: staring at the sunset
  tr FP: gün batımına dik dik bakmak
5392 | terror (noun): an overwhelming feeling of fear and worry | loc: dehşet
  EN TS: They're screaming in terror!
  tr TS: Dehşet içinde çığlık atıyorlar!
  EN FS: They're screaming in a car!
  tr FS: Arabanın içinde çığlık atıyorlar!
  EN TP: screaming in terror
  tr TP: dehşetle çığlık atmak
  EN FP: screaming with joy
  tr FP: sevinçle çığlık atmak
5393 | calm (noun): staying steady in your mind under stress | loc: sakinlik
  EN TS: The T-rex stole her calm.
  tr TS: T-rex onun sakinliğini çaldı.
  EN FS: The dog stole her calm.
  tr FS: Köpek onun sakinliğini çaldı.
  EN TP: losing her calm
  tr TP: sakinliğini kaybetmek
  EN FP: keeping her calm
  tr FP: sakinliğini korumak
5394 | claim (verb): to demand something as your own property | loc: sahiplenmek
  EN TS: Someone claimed it first!
  tr TS: Biri önce sahiplendi!
  EN FS: Nobody claimed it first!
  tr FS: Kimse önce sahiplenmedi!
  EN TP: claiming the frozen land
  tr TP: donmuş toprakları sahiplenmek
  EN FP: claiming a lost bag
  tr FP: kayıp bir çantayı sahiplenmek
5395 | ranch (noun): a large farm where cattle are raised | loc: çiftlik
  EN TS: A ranch hand is riding along the fence.
  tr TS: Bir çiftlik işçisi çit boyunca at sürüyor.
  EN FS: A ranch hand is riding along the river.
  tr FS: Bir çiftlik işçisi nehir boyunca at sürüyor.
  EN TP: a ranch hand riding
  tr TP: at süren bir çiftlik işçisi
  EN FP: a ranch full of cattle
  tr FP: sığırlarla dolu bir çiftlik
5396 | mark (verb): to designate a place with a mark | loc: işaretlemek
  EN TS: Orange flags mark the line.
  tr TS: Turuncu bayraklar çizgiyi işaretliyor.
  EN FS: Blue flags mark the line.
  tr FS: Mavi bayraklar çizgiyi işaretliyor.
  EN TP: marking a line with flags
  tr TP: bayraklarla çizgi işaretlemek
  EN FP: marking an exam paper
  tr FP: sınav kâğıdı işaretlemek
5397 | mighty (adjective): showing great strength or force | loc: kudretli
  EN TS: One mighty wave, four calm seagulls.
  tr TS: Bir kudretli dalga, dört sakin martı.
  EN FS: One mighty wave, four calm ducks.
  tr FS: Bir kudretli dalga, dört sakin ördek.
  EN TP: a mighty wave breaking
  tr TP: kırılan kudretli bir dalga
  EN FP: a mighty king
  tr FP: kudretli bir kral
5398 | chain (noun): a series of things linked together | loc: zincir
  EN TS: People form a human chain.
  tr TS: İnsanlar bir insan zinciri oluşturuyor.
  EN FS: People form a human tower.
  tr FS: İnsanlar bir insan kulesi oluşturuyor.
  EN TP: a human chain around Earth
  tr TP: Dünya'nın çevresinde insan zinciri
  EN FP: a gold chain necklace
  tr FP: altın zincir kolye
5399 | play (noun): a story that actors perform on a stage | loc: oyun
  EN TS: Two actors are in a play.
  tr TS: İki oyuncu bir oyunda rol alıyor.
  EN FS: Two dogs are in a play.
  tr FS: İki köpek bir oyunda rol alıyor.
  EN TP: a play in a theatre
  tr TP: tiyatroda bir oyun
  EN FP: a play at school
  tr FP: okulda bir oyun
5400 | opera (noun): a drama sung to music with an orchestra | loc: opera
  EN TS: She is at the opera in style.
  tr TS: Operaya şık mı şık gitmiş.
  EN FS: She is at the cinema in style.
  tr FS: Sinemaya şık mı şık gitmiş.
  EN TP: a night at the opera
  tr TP: operada bir gece
  EN FP: an opera singer
  tr FP: bir opera şarkıcısı
5401 | wonder (verb): to want to know something | loc: merak etmek
  EN TS: Everyone is wondering.
  tr TS: Herkes merak ediyor.
  EN FS: Everyone is sleeping.
  tr FS: Herkes uyuyor.
  EN TP: wondering about a problem
  tr TP: bir sorunu merak etmek
  EN FP: wondering about the weather
  tr FP: havayı merak etmek
5402 | throat (noun): the passage to your stomach and lungs | loc: boğaz
  EN TS: She is checking his throat.
  tr TS: Adamın boğazını kontrol ediyor.
  EN FS: She is checking his ears.
  tr FS: Adamın kulaklarını kontrol ediyor.
  EN TP: a check of his throat
  tr TP: boğaz kontrolü
  EN FP: a scarf around his throat
  tr FP: boğazına sarılı bir atkı
5403 | time (noun): what clocks measure, in hours and minutes | loc: zaman
  EN TS: She is checking the time.
  tr TS: Zamanı kontrol ediyor.
  EN FS: She is checking the map.
  tr FS: Haritayı kontrol ediyor.
  EN TP: checking the time
  tr TP: zamanı kontrol etmek
  EN FP: wasting time
  tr FP: zaman kaybetmek
5404 | greedy (adjective): wanting far more money than you need | loc: açgözlü
  EN TS: He is so greedy with toast!
  tr TS: Tost konusunda çok açgözlü!
  EN FS: He is so greedy with cake!
  tr FS: Pasta konusunda çok açgözlü!
  EN TP: a greedy toast eater
  tr TP: açgözlü bir tost canavarı
  EN FP: a greedy cake eater
  tr FP: açgözlü bir pasta canavarı
5405 | toddler (noun): a very small child, only a year or two old | loc: yürümeye başlayan çocuk
  EN TS: The toddler is walking!
  tr TS: Yürümeye başlayan çocuk ilk adımlarını atıyor!
  EN FS: The toddler is crawling!
  tr FS: Yürümeye başlayan çocuk emekliyor!
  EN TP: a toddler's first steps
  tr TP: yürümeye başlayan çocuğun ilk adımları
  EN FP: a toddler's first words
  tr FP: yürümeye başlayan çocuğun ilk kelimeleri
5406 | toe (noun): one of the five small end parts of the foot | loc: ayak parmağı
  EN TS: Her toes are next to a shell.
  tr TS: Ayak parmakları bir deniz kabuğunun yanında.
  EN FS: Her toes are next to a crab.
  tr FS: Ayak parmakları bir yengecin yanında.
  EN TP: toes spread in the sand
  tr TP: kumda açılmış ayak parmakları
  EN FP: toes in a flip-flop
  tr FP: parmak arası terlikte ayak parmakları
5407 | toilet (noun): the bathroom fixture you sit on to pee | loc: tuvalet
  EN TS: Everyone needs the toilet now.
  tr TS: Herkesin acilen tuvalete ihtiyacı var.
  EN FS: Everyone needs the exit now.
  tr FS: Herkesin acilen çıkışa ihtiyacı var.
  EN TP: a queue for the toilet
  tr TP: tuvalet kuyruğu
  EN FP: cleaning the toilet
  tr FP: tuvaleti temizlemek
5408 | kit (noun): a case holding a set of things you need | loc: set
  EN TS: The kit solved the chair problem.
  tr TS: Alet seti sandalye sorununu çözdü.
  EN FS: The kit solved the table problem.
  tr FS: Alet seti masa sorununu çözdü.
  EN TP: a red tool kit
  tr TP: kırmızı bir alet seti
  EN FP: a first aid kit
  tr FP: bir ilk yardım seti
5409 | tooth (noun): one of the hard white parts in your jaws | loc: diş
  EN TS: She is showing her teeth.
  tr TS: Dişlerini gösteriyor.
  EN FS: She is showing her tongue.
  tr FS: Dilini gösteriyor.
  EN TP: front teeth up close
  tr TP: yakından ön dişler
  EN FP: a missing front tooth
  tr FP: eksik bir ön diş
5410 | toothbrush (noun): a small brush used for cleaning the teeth | loc: diş fırçası
  EN TS: He has a green toothbrush.
  tr TS: Elinde yeşil bir diş fırçası var.
  EN FS: He has a blue toothbrush.
  tr FS: Elinde mavi bir diş fırçası var.
  EN TP: a green toothbrush
  tr TP: yeşil bir diş fırçası
  EN FP: an electric toothbrush
  tr FP: elektrikli bir diş fırçası
5411 | swirl (noun): a curling, spiral shape | loc: kıvrım
  EN TS: He gets a smear, she gets swirls.
  tr TS: Oğlana bir leke, kıza kıvrımlar.
  EN FS: He gets swirls, she gets a smear.
  tr FS: Oğlana kıvrımlar, kıza bir leke.
  EN TP: a swirl of toothpaste
  tr TP: diş macunundan bir kıvrım
  EN FP: a swirl of whipped cream
  tr FP: çırpılmış kremadan bir kıvrım
5412 | pillar (noun): a tall upright post of stone | loc: sütun
  EN TS: Greek pillars, fluted marble.
  tr TS: Yunan sütunları, oluklu mermer.
  EN FS: Greek pillars, pink marble.
  tr FS: Yunan sütunları, pembe mermer.
  EN TP: huge fluted marble pillars
  tr TP: devasa oluklu mermer sütunlar
  EN FP: a car park pillar
  tr FP: otoparkta bir sütun
5413 | hopeless (adjective): without hope that things can get better | loc: umutsuz
  EN TS: Cars everywhere. Hopeless!
  tr TS: Her yer araba. Umutsuz!
  EN FS: Bikes everywhere. Hopeless!
  tr FS: Her yer bisiklet. Umutsuz!
  EN TP: a hopeless traffic jam
  tr TP: umutsuz bir trafik sıkışıklığı
  EN FP: a hopeless football team
  tr FP: umutsuz bir futbol takımı
5414 | rail (noun): a barrier made of a horizontal bar on supports | loc: korkuluk
  EN TS: He is holding the metal rail.
  tr TS: Metal korkuluğa tutunuyor.
  EN FS: He is holding the metal gate.
  tr FS: Metal kapıya tutunuyor.
  EN TP: the rail of a footbridge
  tr TP: bir yaya köprüsünün korkuluğu
  EN FP: a train on the rail
  tr FP: raylarda bir tren
5415 | red (adjective): the color at the end of the spectrum | loc: kırmızı
  EN TS: He is waiting at a red light.
  tr TS: Kırmızı ışıkta bekliyor.
  EN FS: He is waiting at a bus stop.
  tr FS: Otobüs durağında bekliyor.
  EN TP: a red traffic light
  tr TP: kırmızı bir trafik lambası
  EN FP: a red stop sign
  tr FP: kırmızı bir dur tabelası
5416 | locomotive (noun): the engine at the front that pulls a train | loc: lokomotif
  EN TS: She loves that locomotive.
  tr TS: O lokomotife bayılıyor.
  EN FS: She loves that helicopter.
  tr FS: O helikoptere bayılıyor.
  EN TP: an orange electric locomotive
  tr TP: turuncu bir elektrikli lokomotif
  EN FP: an orange steam locomotive
  tr FP: turuncu bir buharlı lokomotif
5417 | depot (noun): a place where trams or buses are kept | loc: garaj
  EN TS: The tram ends up in the depot.
  tr TS: Tramvay sonunda garaja giriyor.
  EN FS: The tram ends up in a museum.
  tr FS: Tramvay sonunda müzeye giriyor.
  EN TP: trams in a depot
  tr TP: garajda tramvaylar
  EN FP: buses in a depot
  tr FP: garajda otobüsler
5418 | interior (noun): the space that is inside of something | loc: iç mekân
  EN TS: The interior is all wood.
  tr TS: İç mekân baştan aşağı ahşap.
  EN FS: The interior is all plastic.
  tr FS: İç mekân baştan aşağı plastik.
  EN TP: a wooden tram interior
  tr TP: ahşap bir tramvay iç mekânı
  EN FP: a modern car interior
  tr FP: modern bir araba iç mekânı
5419 | transfer (noun): moving something from one place to another | loc: aktarma
  EN TS: He makes every transfer.
  tr TS: Her aktarmaya yetişiyor.
  EN FS: He misses every transfer.
  tr FS: Her aktarmayı kaçırıyor.
  EN TP: a transfer to a ferry
  tr TP: vapura aktarma
  EN FP: a bank transfer
  tr FP: bir banka havalesi
5420 | vessel (noun): a craft built for travel on water | loc: tekne
  EN TS: He is boarding a white vessel.
  tr TS: Beyaz bir tekneye biniyor.
  EN FS: He is boarding a red vessel.
  tr FS: Kırmızı bir tekneye biniyor.
  EN TP: a small passenger vessel
  tr TP: küçük bir yolcu teknesi
  EN FP: a huge cargo vessel
  tr FP: dev bir yük gemisi
5421 | garbage (noun): food and waste thrown out of a kitchen | loc: çöp
  EN TS: The garbage is everywhere!
  tr TS: Çöp her yerde!
  EN FS: The flowers are everywhere!
  tr FS: Çiçekler her yerde!
  EN TP: a bin full of garbage
  tr TP: çöple dolu bir kova
  EN FP: a bin full of flowers
  tr FP: çiçekle dolu bir kova
5422 | recycling (noun): making new products from used materials | loc: geri dönüşüm
  EN TS: Recycling like LeBron.
  tr TS: LeBron gibi geri dönüşüm.
  EN FS: Recycling like Messi.
  tr FS: Messi gibi geri dönüşüm.
  EN TP: throwing into recycling bins
  tr TP: geri dönüşüm kutularına atmak
  EN FP: recycling old clothes
  tr FP: eski kıyafetleri geri dönüşüme vermek
5423 | worldwide (adjective): spread out across the entire world | loc: dünya çapında
  EN TS: His rucksack travels worldwide.
  tr TS: Sırt çantası dünya çapında geziyor.
  EN FS: His rucksack stays in one city.
  tr FS: Sırt çantası tek bir şehirde kalıyor.
  EN TP: travelling worldwide
  tr TP: dünya çapında seyahat
  EN FP: a worldwide phone network
  tr FP: dünya çapında bir telefon ağı
5424 | treaty (noun): a written agreement between two countries | loc: antlaşma
  EN TS: They signed the treaty.
  tr TS: Antlaşmayı imzaladılar.
  EN FS: They tore up the treaty.
  tr FS: Antlaşmayı yırttılar.
  EN TP: shaking hands on a treaty
  tr TP: antlaşma için el sıkışmak
  EN FP: tearing up a treaty
  tr FP: bir antlaşmayı yırtmak
5425 | deal (noun): a single instance of buying or selling | loc: anlaşma
  EN TS: The deal is done.
  tr TS: Anlaşma tamam.
  EN FS: The deal is off.
  tr FS: Anlaşma iptal.
  EN TP: signing a big deal
  tr TP: büyük bir anlaşma imzalamak
  EN FP: a deal at the market
  tr FP: pazarda bir anlaşma
5426 | delegation (noun): a group of representatives sent somewhere | loc: heyet
  EN TS: Both delegations have a deal.
  tr TS: İki heyet de anlaştı.
  EN FS: No delegation has a deal.
  tr FS: Hiçbir heyet anlaşamadı.
  EN TP: two delegations meeting
  tr TP: buluşan iki heyet
  EN FP: a delegation at the airport
  tr FP: havalimanında bir heyet
5427 | seal (noun): a wax fastener that is soft when warm | loc: mühür
  EN TS: The envelope has a red seal.
  tr TS: Zarfta kırmızı bir mühür var.
  EN FS: The envelope has a blue seal.
  tr FS: Zarfta mavi bir mühür var.
  EN TP: a red wax seal
  tr TP: kırmızı bir mum mühür
  EN FP: a seal on the beach
  tr FP: sahilde bir fok
5428 | freight (noun): goods carried by a big truck or ship | loc: yük
  EN TS: The truck is bringing freight.
  tr TS: Kamyon yük getiriyor.
  EN FS: The train is bringing freight.
  tr FS: Tren yük getiriyor.
  EN TP: freight on a big truck
  tr TP: büyük bir kamyonda yük
  EN FP: freight on a ship
  tr FP: bir gemide yük
5429 | trust (verb): to have confidence in other people | loc: güvenmek
  EN TS: She trusts them, eyes closed.
  tr TS: Gözleri kapalı onlara güveniyor.
  EN FS: She trusts them, eyes open.
  tr FS: Gözleri açık onlara güveniyor.
  EN TP: trusting the team to catch
  tr TP: takımın yakalayacağına güvenmek
  EN FP: trusting a stranger online
  tr FP: internetteki bir yabancıya güvenmek
5430 | fast (adjective): moving or able to move very quickly | loc: hızlı
  EN TS: She is fast on her road bike.
  tr TS: Yol bisikletiyle çok hızlı.
  EN FS: She is fast on her skateboard.
  tr FS: Kaykayıyla çok hızlı.
  EN TP: a fast ride through tunnels
  tr TP: tünellerden hızlı bir sürüş
  EN FP: a fast ride through town
  tr FP: şehir içinde hızlı bir sürüş
5431 | balloon (noun): a big bag filled with hot air that carries people | loc: balon
  EN TS: She is flying in a balloon.
  tr TS: Balonla uçuyor.
  EN FS: She is flying in a plane.
  tr FS: Uçakla uçuyor.
  EN TP: a balloon over rocks
  tr TP: kayaların üstünde bir balon
  EN FP: a party balloon
  tr FP: bir parti balonu
5432 | trick (verb): to deceive somebody for fun | loc: kandırmak
  EN TS: He is tricking the poor guy!
  tr TS: Zavallı adamı kandırıyor!
  EN FS: He is tricking the poor dog!
  tr FS: Zavallı köpeği kandırıyor!
  EN TP: tricking a customer
  tr TP: bir müşteriyi kandırmak
  EN FP: tricking a teacher
  tr FP: bir öğretmeni kandırmak
5433 | turn on (verb): to make something work by flipping a switch | loc: açmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is turning on the lights.
  tr TS: Işıkları açıyor.
  EN FS: He is turning off the lights.
  tr FS: Işıkları kapatıyor.
  EN TP: to turn on fairy lights
  tr TP: dekoratif ışıkları açmak
  EN FP: to turn on the TV
  tr FP: televizyonu açmak
5434 | electricity (noun): the energy made by moving electrons | loc: elektrik
  EN TS: She is wasting electricity!
  tr TS: Elektriği israf ediyor!
  EN FS: She is wasting paper!
  tr FS: Kâğıdı israf ediyor!
  EN TP: using lots of electricity
  tr TP: bolca elektrik kullanmak
  EN FP: electricity from solar panels
  tr FP: güneş panellerinden elektrik
5435 | alike (adjective): having the same or similar features | loc: benzer
  EN TS: OMG, they dress exactly alike.
  tr TS: Aman tanrım, tıpatıp benzer giyinmişler.
  EN FS: OMG, they dress differently.
  tr FS: Aman tanrım, bambaşka giyinmişler.
  EN TP: dressed exactly alike
  tr TP: tıpatıp benzer giyinmiş
  EN FP: alike in school uniforms
  tr FP: okul üniformasıyla benzer
5436 | twist (verb): to move in a twisting motion | loc: bükmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The team is twisting dough.
  tr TS: Ekip hamur büküyor.
  EN FS: The team is cutting dough.
  tr FS: Ekip hamur kesiyor.
  EN TP: twisting a rope of dough
  tr TP: fitil gibi hamur bükmek
  EN FP: twisting a rope of wool
  tr FP: fitil gibi yün bükmek
5437 | courtyard (noun): an open space with buildings all around it | loc: avlu
  EN TS: Party in the courtyard!
  tr TS: Avluda parti!
  EN FS: Party in the kitchen!
  tr FS: Mutfakta parti!
  EN TP: a courtyard party with lights
  tr TP: ışıklı bir avlu partisi
  EN FP: a school courtyard at break
  tr FP: teneffüste okul avlusu
5438 | filling (noun): any material that fills a space or container | loc: dolgu
  EN TS: A bowl of red filling.
  tr TS: Bir kâse kırmızı dolgu.
  EN FS: A bowl of green filling.
  tr FS: Bir kâse yeşil dolgu.
  EN TP: red fruit filling
  tr TP: kırmızı meyve dolgusu
  EN FP: a filling at the dentist
  tr FP: dişçide bir dolgu
5439 | grey (adjective): a color between white and black | loc: gri
  EN TS: Four men, one grey umbrella!
  tr TS: Dört adam, tek gri şemsiye!
  EN FS: Four men, one red umbrella!
  tr FS: Dört adam, tek kırmızı şemsiye!
  EN TP: a grey rainy city
  tr TP: gri, yağmurlu bir şehir
  EN FP: a grey winter coat
  tr FP: gri bir kış montu
5440 | nephew (noun): the son of your brother or sister | loc: yeğen
  EN TS: Kite day with his nephew.
  tr TS: Yeğeniyle uçurtma günü.
  EN FS: Kite day with his dog.
  tr FS: Köpeğiyle uçurtma günü.
  EN TP: flying kites with a nephew
  tr TP: yeğenle uçurtma uçurmak
  EN FP: fishing with a nephew
  tr FP: yeğenle balık tutmak
5441 | uncle (noun): the brother of your father or mother | loc: amca
  EN TS: The uncle let her win.
  tr TS: Amca kızın kazanmasına izin verdi.
  EN FS: The uncle let him win.
  tr FS: Amca oğlanın kazanmasına izin verdi.
  EN TP: arm-wrestling with an uncle
  tr TP: amcayla bilek güreşi
  EN FP: boxing with an uncle
  tr FP: amcayla boks
5442 | sleeve (noun): the part of a garment that covers the arm | loc: kol
  EN TS: He is fighting every sleeve!
  tr TS: Her kolla savaşıyor!
  EN FS: He is fighting every zip!
  tr FS: Her fermuarla savaşıyor!
  EN TP: pulling arms out of sleeves
  tr TP: kollarını ceketten çıkarmak
  EN FP: rolling up the sleeves
  tr FP: kolları sıvamak
5443 | solidarity (noun): a union of purposes among members of a group | loc: dayanışma
  EN TS: Solidarity fills the street.
  tr TS: Dayanışma sokağı dolduruyor.
  EN FS: Solidarity fills the stadium.
  tr FS: Dayanışma stadyumu dolduruyor.
  EN TP: a chain of solidarity
  tr TP: bir dayanışma zinciri
  EN FP: a chain of shops
  tr FP: bir mağaza zinciri
5444 | cooperate (verb): to work together on a common project | loc: iş birliği yapmak
  EN TS: They're cooperating on a map.
  tr TS: Bir harita üzerinde iş birliği yapıyorlar.
  EN FS: They're cooperating on a car.
  tr FS: Bir araba üzerinde iş birliği yapıyorlar.
  EN TP: cooperating on a puzzle
  tr TP: bir yapboz üzerinde iş birliği yapmak
  EN FP: cooperating with the police
  tr FP: polisle iş birliği yapmak
5445 | useless (adjective): having no beneficial use, not working usefully | loc: işe yaramaz
  EN TS: His umbrella is useless now.
  tr TS: Şemsiyesi artık işe yaramaz.
  EN FS: His briefcase is useless now.
  tr FS: Evrak çantası artık işe yaramaz.
  EN TP: a useless umbrella
  tr TP: işe yaramaz bir şemsiye
  EN FP: a useless umbrella in sunshine
  tr FP: güneşte işe yaramaz bir şemsiye
5446 | misty (adjective): covered in thin fog that hides things | loc: sisli
  EN TS: The hills are misty.
  tr TS: Tepeler sisli.
  EN FS: The hills are sunny.
  tr FS: Tepeler güneşli.
  EN TP: misty hills over a lake
  tr TP: gölün üstünde sisli tepeler
  EN FP: misty eyes at a wedding
  tr FP: düğünde dolan gözler
5447 | remote (adjective): located far away in space | loc: uzak
  EN TS: This road is very remote.
  tr TS: Bu yol her yerden çok uzak.
  EN FS: This road is very busy.
  tr FS: Bu yol çok kalabalık.
  EN TP: a remote desert road
  tr TP: uzak bir çöl yolu
  EN FP: a remote control
  tr FP: bir uzaktan kumanda
5448 | billboard (noun): a huge board above a street where ads are posted | loc: reklam panosu
  EN TS: Billboards on every wall!
  tr TS: Her duvarda reklam panosu!
  EN FS: Paintings on every wall!
  tr FS: Her duvarda tablo!
  EN TP: huge lit billboards
  tr TP: devasa ışıklı reklam panoları
  EN FP: a billboard in a field
  tr FP: tarlada bir reklam panosu
5449 | doorway (noun): the opening in a wall where a door is | loc: kapı aralığı
  EN TS: She is in the doorway at last.
  tr TS: Sonunda kapı aralığında.
  EN FS: She is in the garden at last.
  tr FS: Sonunda bahçede.
  EN TP: an open stone doorway
  tr TP: açık bir taş kapı aralığı
  EN FP: a doorway with a curtain
  tr FP: perdeli bir kapı aralığı
5450 | device (noun): a thing invented for a particular purpose | loc: cihaz
  EN TS: Saving money: she is unplugging devices.
  tr TS: Para biriktirmek için cihazların fişini çekiyor.
  EN FS: Saving money: she is plugging in devices.
  tr FS: Para biriktirmek için cihazları prize takıyor.
  EN TP: unplugging every device
  tr TP: her cihazın fişini çekmek
  EN FP: charging every device
  tr FP: her cihazı şarj etmek
5451 | injection (noun): medicine put into the body with a needle | loc: enjeksiyon
  EN TS: One injection, now he is Hulk!
  tr TS: Tek enjeksiyon, şimdi Hulk oldu!
  EN FS: One pill, now he is Hulk!
  tr FS: Tek hap, şimdi Hulk oldu!
  EN TP: an injection in the arm
  tr TP: kola enjeksiyon
  EN FP: an injection in the leg
  tr FP: bacağa enjeksiyon
5452 | peaceful (adjective): not disturbed by fighting or trouble | loc: huzurlu
  EN TS: A peaceful lake in the mist.
  tr TS: Sisin içinde huzurlu bir göl.
  EN FS: A peaceful beach in the mist.
  tr FS: Sisin içinde huzurlu bir plaj.
  EN TP: a peaceful mountain lake
  tr TP: huzurlu bir dağ gölü
  EN FP: a peaceful mountain village
  tr FP: huzurlu bir dağ köyü
5453 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: vazo
  EN TS: She is filling a blue vase.
  tr TS: Mavi bir vazoyu dolduruyor.
  EN FS: She is filling a red vase.
  tr FS: Kırmızı bir vazoyu dolduruyor.
  EN TP: putting flowers in a vase
  tr TP: vazoya çiçek koymak
  EN FP: breaking a flower vase
  tr FP: çiçek vazosunu kırmak
5454 | ink (noun): a liquid used for printing or writing | loc: mürekkep
  EN TS: Ink is splashing all over the passport.
  tr TS: Mürekkep pasaportun her yerine sıçrıyor.
  EN FS: Water is splashing all over the passport.
  tr FS: Su pasaportun her yerine sıçrıyor.
  EN TP: black ink drops
  tr TP: siyah mürekkep damlaları
  EN FP: blue ink on fingers
  tr FP: parmaklarda mavi mürekkep
5455 | approval (noun): the official act of approving something | loc: onay
  EN TS: He got the approval!
  tr TS: Onayı aldı!
  EN FS: He got no approval!
  tr FS: Onay alamadı!
  EN TP: approval for a passport
  tr TP: pasaport için onay
  EN FP: approval from his parents
  tr FP: ailesinden onay
5456 | permission (noun): approval that lets you do something | loc: izin | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He got permission.
  tr TS: İzin aldı.
  EN FS: He got no permission.
  tr FS: İzin alamadı.
  EN TP: permission to travel
  tr TP: seyahat izni
  EN FP: permission to park
  tr FP: park izni
5457 | visitor (noun): someone who comes to visit you | loc: ziyaretçi
  EN TS: The visitors brought a cake.
  tr TS: Ziyaretçiler pasta getirdi.
  EN FS: The visitors brought a dog.
  tr FS: Ziyaretçiler köpek getirdi.
  EN TP: visitors with a cake
  tr TP: pastalı ziyaretçiler
  EN FP: visitors at a museum
  tr FP: müzede ziyaretçiler
5458 | vitamin (noun): a substance in food that keeps you healthy | loc: vitamin
  EN TS: The vitamin is fizzing like crazy!
  tr TS: Vitamin deli gibi köpürüyor!
  EN FS: The milk is fizzing like crazy!
  tr FS: Süt deli gibi köpürüyor!
  EN TP: a fizzing vitamin tablet
  tr TP: köpüren bir vitamin tableti
  EN FP: a melting vitamin gummy
  tr FP: eriyen bir vitamin şekeri
5459 | lava (noun): melted rock that flows out of a volcano | loc: lav
  EN TS: Lava on every slope.
  tr TS: Her yamaçta lav.
  EN FS: Snow on every slope.
  tr FS: Her yamaçta kar.
  EN TP: glowing streams of lava
  tr TP: parlayan lav akıntıları
  EN FP: lava in a lamp
  tr FP: bir lambada lav
5460 | sickness (noun): when your body cannot function normally | loc: rahatsızlık
  EN TS: The teacups cause sickness!
  tr TS: Dönen fincanlar rahatsızlık veriyor!
  EN FS: The big wheel causes sickness!
  tr FS: Dönme dolap rahatsızlık veriyor!
  EN TP: sickness after a ride
  tr TP: bir turdan sonra rahatsızlık
  EN FP: sickness on a ship
  tr FP: gemide rahatsızlık
5461 | ballot (noun): a document listing the choices you vote for | loc: oy pusulası
  EN TS: Everyone is posting a ballot.
  tr TS: Herkes oy pusulası atıyor.
  EN FS: Everyone is posting a letter.
  tr FS: Herkes mektup atıyor.
  EN TP: posting a folded ballot
  tr TP: katlanmış oy pusulası atmak
  EN FP: reading a long ballot
  tr FP: uzun bir oy pusulası okumak
5462 | democracy (noun): a system where citizens elect their leaders | loc: demokrasi
  EN TS: Democracy in one plastic box.
  tr TS: Tek bir plastik kutuda demokrasi.
  EN FS: Democracy in one wooden box.
  tr FS: Tek bir ahşap kutuda demokrasi.
  EN TP: democracy in action
  tr TP: iş başında demokrasi
  EN FP: democracy on television
  tr FP: televizyonda demokrasi
5463 | journal (noun): a daily written record of your experiences | loc: günlük
  EN TS: He's journaling at sea. Vibes.
  tr TS: Denizde günlük yazıyor. Tam kafa.
  EN FS: He's journaling in bed. Vibes.
  tr FS: Yatakta günlük yazıyor. Tam kafa.
  EN TP: writing a travel journal
  tr TP: seyahat günlüğü yazmak
  EN FP: reading a science journal
  tr FP: bilim dergisi okumak
5464 | slim (adjective): having a slender, thin body | loc: ince
  EN TS: She is slim.
  tr TS: Kadın ince yapılı.
  EN FS: He is slim.
  tr FS: Adam ince yapılı.
  EN TP: a slim woman in jeans
  tr TP: kot pantolonlu ince bir kadın
  EN FP: a slim woman in shorts
  tr FP: şortlu ince bir kadın
5465 | waist (noun): the narrow middle of the body above the hips | loc: bel
  EN TS: Waist measured. Belt fitted.
  tr TS: Bel ölçüldü. Kemer takıldı.
  EN FS: Arm measured. Belt fitted.
  tr FS: Kol ölçüldü. Kemer takıldı.
  EN TP: measuring her waist
  tr TP: belini ölçmek
  EN FP: an apron round her waist
  tr FP: belinde bir önlük
5466 | formal (adjective): following the established rules, like formal dress | loc: resmi
  EN TS: The waiter looks very formal.
  tr TS: Garson çok resmi görünüyor.
  EN FS: The waiter looks very casual.
  tr FS: Garson çok salaş görünüyor.
  EN TP: a formal waiter's uniform
  tr TP: resmi bir garson üniforması
  EN FP: a formal letter of complaint
  tr FP: resmi bir şikâyet mektubu
5467 | awake (verb): to stop sleeping and open your eyes | loc: uyanmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The boy is awaking in shock!
  tr TS: Çocuk şok içinde uyanıyor!
  EN FS: The dog is awaking in shock!
  tr FS: Köpek şok içinde uyanıyor!
  EN TP: awaking in a bunk bed
  tr TP: ranzada uyanmak
  EN FP: awaking in a tent
  tr FP: çadırda uyanmak
5468 | sign (noun): a big board that shows advertisements | loc: tabela
  EN TS: The signs are glowing.
  tr TS: Tabelalar parlıyor.
  EN FS: The trees are glowing.
  tr FS: Ağaçlar parlıyor.
  EN TP: huge glowing signs
  tr TP: kocaman parlayan tabelalar
  EN FP: a stop sign
  tr FP: bir dur tabelası
5469 | walker (noun): someone who walks for exercise or pleasure | loc: yürüyüşçü
  EN TS: This walker did 10,000 steps!
  tr TS: Bu yürüyüşçü 10.000 adım attı!
  EN FS: This walker did 100 steps!
  tr FS: Bu yürüyüşçü 100 adım attı!
  EN TP: a walker with Nordic poles
  tr TP: batonlu bir yürüyüşçü
  EN FP: a walker in the mountains
  tr FP: dağda bir yürüyüşçü
5470 | downtown (noun): the busy central business area of a city | loc: şehir merkezi
  EN TS: Fast walk downtown in a suit.
  tr TS: Takım elbiseyle şehir merkezinde hızlı yürüyüş.
  EN FS: Fast walk downtown in jeans.
  tr FS: Kotla şehir merkezinde hızlı yürüyüş.
  EN TP: walking to work downtown
  tr TP: şehir merkezinde işe yürümek
  EN FP: a downtown rooftop bar
  tr FP: şehir merkezinde bir çatı barı
5471 | level (adjective): flat, with no part higher or lower | loc: düz
  EN TS: The bubble says it's level.
  tr TS: Kabarcık düz olduğunu söylüyor.
  EN FS: The bubble says it's crooked.
  tr FS: Kabarcık eğri olduğunu söylüyor.
  EN TP: a level picture frame
  tr TP: düz asılmış bir resim çerçevesi
  EN FP: a level road
  tr FP: düz bir yol
5472 | bill (noun): a piece of paper money from a bank | loc: banknot
  EN TS: The bills are falling out.
  tr TS: Banknotlar dökülüyor.
  EN FS: The keys are falling out.
  tr FS: Anahtarlar dökülüyor.
  EN TP: bills falling from a wallet
  tr TP: cüzdandan dökülen banknotlar
  EN FP: bills in a cash machine
  tr FP: ATM'de banknotlar
5473 | wealthy (adjective): having a lot of money and valuable things | loc: varlıklı
  EN TS: A "wealthy" man with an empty wallet.
  tr TS: Boş cüzdanlı "varlıklı" bir adam.
  EN FS: A "wealthy" man with a full wallet.
  tr FS: Dolu cüzdanlı "varlıklı" bir adam.
  EN TP: a not so wealthy man
  tr TP: pek de varlıklı olmayan bir adam
  EN FP: a wealthy man's big house
  tr FP: varlıklı bir adamın büyük evi
5474 | coin (noun): a flat metal piece used as money | loc: madenî para
  EN TS: He is sorting his coins.
  tr TS: Madenî paralarını ayırıyor.
  EN FS: He is sorting his cards.
  tr FS: Kartlarını ayırıyor.
  EN TP: coins from a purse
  tr TP: bozuk para cüzdanından madenî paralar
  EN FP: coins in a fountain
  tr FP: çeşmede madenî paralar
5475 | tank (noun): an armored military vehicle | loc: tank
  EN TS: A tank is coming behind them!
  tr TS: Arkalarından bir tank geliyor!
  EN FS: A horse is coming behind them!
  tr FS: Arkalarından bir at geliyor!
  EN TP: a tank in the smoke
  tr TP: dumanın içinde bir tank
  EN FP: a tank full of water
  tr FP: su dolu bir tank
5476 | debris (noun): the bits left when something is destroyed | loc: enkaz
  EN TS: She is walking over debris.
  tr TS: Enkazın üstünde yürüyor.
  EN FS: She is walking over flowers.
  tr FS: Çiçeklerin üstünde yürüyor.
  EN TP: walking through debris
  tr TP: enkazın arasından yürümek
  EN FP: sweeping up the debris
  tr FP: enkazı süpürmek
5477 | fort (noun): a strong defensive structure | loc: kale
  EN TS: Best snow fort battle ever.
  tr TS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi kar kalesi savaşı.
  EN FS: Best sand fort battle ever.
  tr FS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi kum kalesi savaşı.
  EN TP: a fort made of snow
  tr TP: kardan bir kale
  EN FP: a fort made of stone
  tr FP: taştan bir kale
5478 | stuff (noun): objects of all kinds, not named | loc: eşya
  EN TS: Her stuff is attacking her!
  tr TS: Eşyaları ona saldırıyor!
  EN FS: Her books are attacking her!
  tr FS: Kitapları ona saldırıyor!
  EN TP: stuff falling out
  tr TP: dökülen eşyalar
  EN FP: stuff under the bed
  tr FP: yatağın altındaki eşyalar
5479 | robe (noun): a long loose piece of clothing | loc: cübbe | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc cübbe = judge/academic gown; this robe is a satin dressing gown = sabahlık
  EN TS: A robe and a "tiny" wardrobe.
  tr TS: Bir sabahlık ve "minicik" bir gardırop.
  EN FS: A robe and a "tiny" kitchen.
  tr FS: Bir sabahlık ve "minicik" bir mutfak.
  EN TP: a long satin robe
  tr TP: uzun, saten bir sabahlık
  EN FP: a hotel spa robe
  tr FP: otel spa bornozu
5480 | task (noun): a piece of work you take on | loc: görev
  EN TS: His task is a tower of plates.
  tr TS: Görevi bir tabak kulesi.
  EN FS: His task is a tower of shoes.
  tr FS: Görevi bir ayakkabı kulesi.
  EN TP: a hard kitchen task
  tr TP: zor bir mutfak görevi
  EN FP: a task at the computer
  tr FP: bilgisayar başında bir görev
5481 | pink (adjective): a light shade of red | loc: pembe
  EN TS: Pink hair, white shirt. Phew.
  tr TS: Pembe saç, beyaz gömlek. Oh be.
  EN FS: Pink hair, pink shirt. Phew.
  tr FS: Pembe saç, pembe gömlek. Oh be.
  EN TP: long bright pink hair
  tr TP: uzun, parlak pembe saçlar
  EN FP: a pink washing machine
  tr FP: pembe bir çamaşır makinesi
5482 | bath (noun): when you soak and wash your body in a tub | loc: banyo
  EN TS: The dog is having a bath. Spa day!
  tr TS: Köpek banyo yapıyor. Spa günü!
  EN FS: The cat is having a bath. Spa day!
  tr FS: Kedi banyo yapıyor. Spa günü!
  EN TP: a dog in a bath
  tr TP: banyo yapan bir köpek
  EN FP: a dog in a pool
  tr FP: havuzda yüzen bir köpek
5483 | scan (verb): to examine something closely | loc: taramak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is scanning the beach. For who?
  tr TS: Plajı gözleriyle tarıyor. Kimi arıyor acaba?
  EN FS: She is scanning the forest. For who?
  tr FS: Ormanı gözleriyle tarıyor. Kimi arıyor acaba?
  EN TP: scanning the shore
  tr TP: sahili taramak
  EN FP: scanning a barcode
  tr FP: barkod taramak
5484 | gaze (verb): to look at something steadily for a long time | loc: uzun uzun bakmak
  EN TS: They're gazing at fireworks.
  tr TS: Havai fişeklere uzun uzun bakıyorlar.
  EN FS: They're gazing at the sea.
  tr FS: Denize uzun uzun bakıyorlar.
  EN TP: gazing at the sky
  tr TP: gökyüzüne uzun uzun bakmak
  EN FP: gazing at the screen
  tr FP: ekrana uzun uzun bakmak
5485 | watering can (noun): a container with a spout for watering plants | loc: sulama kabı
  EN TS: She is using a watering can.
  tr TS: Sulama kabı kullanıyor.
  EN FS: She is using a garden hose.
  tr FS: Bahçe hortumu kullanıyor.
  EN TP: a green watering can
  tr TP: yeşil bir sulama kabı
  EN FP: an empty watering can
  tr FP: boş bir sulama kabı
5486 | flowerpot (noun): a clay container that a plant grows in | loc: saksı
  EN TS: He is watering the flowerpot.
  tr TS: Saksıyı suluyor.
  EN FS: He is painting the flowerpot.
  tr FS: Saksıyı boyuyor.
  EN TP: a flowerpot on the windowsill
  tr TP: pencere pervazında bir saksı
  EN FP: a broken flowerpot
  tr FP: kırık bir saksı
5487 | surfing (noun): the sport of riding a surfboard on waves | loc: sörf
  EN TS: Surfing inside a wave is cool!
  tr TS: Dalganın içinde sörf yapmak efsane!
  EN FS: Diving inside a wave is cool!
  tr FS: Dalganın içinde dalış yapmak efsane!
  EN TP: surfing a giant wave
  tr TP: dev bir dalgada sörf
  EN FP: surfing the internet
  tr FP: internette sörf
5488 | farewell (noun): an expression of goodwill at parting | loc: veda
  EN TS: This farewell is taking forever.
  tr TS: Bu veda bitmek bilmiyor.
  EN FS: This welcome is taking forever.
  tr FS: Bu karşılama bitmek bilmiyor.
  EN TP: a farewell at the port
  tr TP: limanda bir veda
  EN FP: a farewell at the airport
  tr FP: havalimanında bir veda
5489 | wear (verb): to be dressed in something | loc: giymek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She wears every coat so well.
  tr TS: Hangi paltoyu giyse yakışıyor.
  EN FS: She wears every suit so well.
  tr FS: Hangi takımı giyse yakışıyor.
  EN TP: wearing a feather hat
  tr TP: tüylü bir şapka takmak
  EN FP: wearing a straw hat
  tr FP: hasır bir şapka takmak
5490 | weed (noun): a plant that crowds out garden plants | loc: yabani ot
  EN TS: He pulled out a giant weed!
  tr TS: Dev bir yabani otu kökünden söktü!
  EN FS: He pulled out a giant carrot!
  tr FS: Dev bir havucu kökünden söktü!
  EN TP: pulling out a weed
  tr TP: yabani ot sökmek
  EN FP: a weed in the pavement
  tr FP: kaldırımda bir yabani ot
5491 | welcome (adjective): received with pleasure | loc: hoş karşılanan
  EN TS: He is so welcome here!
  tr TS: Burada çok hoş karşılanıyor!
  EN FS: He is so lonely here!
  tr FS: Burada çok yalnız!
  EN TP: a welcome guest
  tr TP: hoş karşılanan bir misafir
  EN FP: a welcome break from work
  tr FP: işten hoş bir mola
5492 | spoke (noun): a bar joining a wheel's hub to its rim | loc: jant teli
  EN TS: The wheel has thin spokes.
  tr TS: Tekerleğin ince jant telleri var.
  EN FS: The wheel has no spokes.
  tr FS: Tekerleğin hiç jant teli yok.
  EN TP: thin metal spokes
  tr TP: ince metal jant telleri
  EN FP: thin wooden spokes
  tr FP: ince ahşap jant telleri
5493 | hub (noun): the central part of a wheel, around the axle | loc: poyra
  EN TS: He loves every hub he sees.
  tr TS: Gördüğü her poyraya bayılıyor.
  EN FS: He loves every car he sees.
  tr FS: Gördüğü her arabaya bayılıyor.
  EN TP: the hub of a wheel
  tr TP: bir tekerleğin poyrası
  EN FP: the hub of a city
  tr FP: şehrin kalbi
5494 | disabled (adjective): having a condition that limits what you can do | loc: engelli
  EN TS: A disabled man is rolling fast.
  tr TS: Engelli bir adam hızla ilerliyor.
  EN FS: A disabled man is rolling slowly.
  tr FS: Engelli bir adam yavaşça ilerliyor.
  EN TP: a disabled wheelchair user
  tr TP: tekerlekli sandalyeli engelli biri
  EN FP: a disabled man on crutches
  tr FP: koltuk değnekli engelli bir adam
5495 | rumor (noun): a story passed around by word of mouth | loc: söylenti
  EN TS: A rumor in the library!
  tr TS: Kütüphanede bir söylenti!
  EN FS: A rumor in the kitchen!
  tr FS: Mutfakta bir söylenti!
  EN TP: passing on a rumor
  tr TP: söylenti yaymak
  EN FP: starting a rumor online
  tr FP: internette söylenti başlatmak
5496 | adjust (verb): to alter something so that it is just right | loc: düzeltmek
  EN TS: She is adjusting his tie.
  tr TS: Kravatını düzeltiyor.
  EN FS: She is adjusting his hat.
  tr FS: Şapkasını düzeltiyor.
  EN TP: adjusting a tie knot
  tr TP: kravat düğümünü düzeltmek
  EN FP: adjusting a watch
  tr FP: saati ayarlamak
5497 | candidate (noun): a politician running for public office | loc: aday
  EN TS: The candidate won!
  tr TS: Aday kazandı!
  EN FS: The candidate lost!
  tr FS: Aday kaybetti!
  EN TP: a winning candidate
  tr TP: kazanan bir aday
  EN FP: a losing candidate
  tr FP: kaybeden bir aday
5498 | window (noun): the glass opening in the side of a vehicle | loc: pencere
  EN TS: Every window, a new view!
  tr TS: Her pencere, yeni bir manzara!
  EN FS: Every door, a new view!
  tr FS: Her kapı, yeni bir manzara!
  EN TP: leaning out of a window
  tr TP: pencereden sarkmak
  EN FP: cleaning a window
  tr FP: pencere silmek
5499 | woman (noun): an adult female person | loc: kadın
  EN TS: A woman in red is spinning.
  tr TS: Kırmızılı bir kadın dönüp duruyor.
  EN FS: A woman in red is jogging.
  tr FS: Kırmızılı bir kadın koşu yapıyor.
  EN TP: a woman watering her flowers
  tr TP: çiçeklerini sulayan bir kadın
  EN FP: a woman buying flowers
  tr FP: çiçek alan bir kadın
5500 | timber (noun): wood cut and prepared for building | loc: kereste
  EN TS: Fresh timber lies in a pile.
  tr TS: Taze kereste yığın halinde duruyor.
  EN FS: Fresh timber lies in a truck.
  tr FS: Taze kereste bir kamyonda duruyor.
  EN TP: a pile of fresh timber
  tr TP: bir yığın taze kereste
  EN FP: a truck of fresh timber
  tr FP: bir kamyon dolusu taze kereste
5501 | industry (noun): making goods and services to sell | loc: sanayi
  EN TS: He works in heavy industry.
  tr TS: Ağır sanayide çalışıyor.
  EN FS: He works in a flower shop.
  tr FS: Bir çiçekçide çalışıyor.
  EN TP: a heavy industry factory
  tr TP: bir ağır sanayi fabrikası
  EN FP: the tourist industry
  tr FP: turizm sektörü
5502 | storage (noun): the act of storing things somewhere | loc: depolama
  EN TS: Boxes are going into storage.
  tr TS: Kutular depolamaya gidiyor.
  EN FS: Boxes are going into the bin.
  tr FS: Kutular çöpe gidiyor.
  EN TP: boxes for storage
  tr TP: depolama kutuları
  EN FP: storage on a phone
  tr FP: telefonda depolama alanı
5503 | position (noun): the way the body and limbs are arranged | loc: pozisyon
  EN TS: She is in plank position.
  tr TS: Plank pozisyonunda.
  EN FS: She is in lotus position.
  tr FS: Lotus pozisyonunda.
  EN TP: a high plank position
  tr TP: yüksek plank pozisyonu
  EN FP: a position in the company
  tr FP: şirkette bir pozisyon
5504 | send (verb): to cause something to be taken to another place | loc: göndermek
  EN TS: She is sending a letter.
  tr TS: Mektup gönderiyor.
  EN FS: She is sending a parcel.
  tr FS: Koli gönderiyor.
  EN TP: sending a handwritten letter
  tr TP: el yazısı bir mektup göndermek
  EN FP: sending a text message
  tr FP: kısa mesaj göndermek
5505 | film (noun): photographic material you take pictures on | loc: film
  EN TS: She is studying an X-ray film.
  tr TS: Bir röntgen filmini inceliyor.
  EN FS: She is studying a paper map.
  tr FS: Kâğıt bir haritayı inceliyor.
  EN TP: an X-ray film
  tr TP: bir röntgen filmi
  EN FP: a film at the cinema
  tr FP: sinemada bir film
5506 | dance (noun): a party where people meet to dance | loc: dans partisi
  EN TS: Literally everyone came to this dance.
  tr TS: Bu dans partisine resmen herkes gelmiş.
  EN FS: Literally nobody came to this dance.
  tr FS: Bu dans partisine resmen kimse gelmemiş.
  EN TP: a street dance at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında sokak dans partisi
  EN FP: a dance class at school
  tr FP: okulda dans dersi
5507 | zoo (noun): a place where wild animals are kept to see | loc: hayvanat bahçesi
  EN TS: He is having fun at the zoo.
  tr TS: Hayvanat bahçesinde eğleniyor.
  EN FS: He is having fun at the beach.
  tr FS: Plajda eğleniyor.
  EN TP: a day at the zoo
  tr TP: hayvanat bahçesinde bir gün
  EN FP: a day at the farm
  tr FP: çiftlikte bir gün
